https://newspapers.library.wales/view/3320640
Page 1
The Cambrian
28th January 1804 

TO THE PUBLIC. 
ON the first appearance of a New Paper be fore that august Tribunal which is ultimately to fix its destiny, Custom exacts a disclosure of its claim to notice: obedient to her mandate, we intreat attention while we concisely develope the motives on which our pretensions to approbation and favour are grounded. 
The utility of Newspapers is too obvious to require a single comment; yet, notwithstanding their great increase of late years, particularly Provincial Journals, the Principality of Wales has, till now, been denied one of those vehicles of refinement, instruction, and amusement; when in no part of the kingdom could the necessity for such an establishment more strongly exist. Its numerously enlightened inhabitants have thus been subjected to various inconveniences from the same cause, the importance of the trade of Wales, its valuable resources, and commercial enterprise, are at this moment but imperfectly known. These considerations gave birth to THE CAMBRIAN. 
Our design is not merely to multiply the channels of general knowledge we have formed expectations of a more elevated nature and ardently hope to be instrumental in rendering service to the Principality lastingly beneficial. We, therefore, again earnestly invite all who can estimate the best means of promoting the advantage of Wales, by the improvement of Agriculture, extension of Trade, or otherwise, to transmit their suggestions, (post-paid) and THE CAMBRIAN shall be the means of dissemination. 
It will moreover be our study to convey early and authentic details of every interesting transaction at home and abroad we shall faithfully record the proceedings of the Legislature, and all important decisions in the Law Courts: the prices of the London Markets, and fluctuations of the public Funds, shall be correctly stated; and no subject worthy of observation shall escape our researches. Our arrangements will enable us to anticipate the London prints in regard to Irish news; an object, at the present crisis, deserving of remark. 
Independence and Impartiality shall be our basis- Truth our guide. We will never sacrifice at the shrine of Party. The envied Constitution of this Realm shall uniformly have our firmest support, and the Laws our reverence. Our unceasing endeavours will be directed to cherish the noble ardour, and fan the generous flame of patriotism, which has roused Britain's sons to arms in defence of their sacred rights and privileges, threatened with destruction, "by a fierce and haughty foe, for that we alone among the nations have been found to withstand his violent and unjust ambition." 
Intelligent Agents have been appointed in the chief towns of Wales to forward regular accounts of the arrival and sailing of shipping-returns of the prices of grain, cattle, and other merchandise in the principal markets and fairs-names of company frequenting the different places of fashionable resort-and all occurrences which may be entitled to narration. To this multifarious intelligence will be united the local information of the neighbouring English counties. Hence, it is presumed, the provincial department of this Paper will be found peculiarly attractive. 
The facility which THE CAMBRIAN will afford for reciprocally communicating and supplying wants of every description, must not pass unnoticed. For a comparatively trifling expence, may be advertised the intended public or private disposal of landed or other property-the sailing of a ship to a particular port; or the arrival of another with a cargo for sale-schemes of invention, &c. &c. By this mode also, masters may have a choice of servants, and the latter obtain desirable situations-the artist or tradesman newly arrived will be known throughout the Principality within a week-the monied-man may abuse his security for loans, and the needy be furnished, without an exposure of names except to each other. In short, so extensively useful is a Newspaper in this respect, that it has been truly described as a resource which knows no bounds. 
Having now declared our views and intended system of conduct, we resign THE CAMBRIAN into the hands of a liberal and discriminating Public, in confident expectation of indulgent support and patronage, so long as our actions and professions shall accord. Welchmen, acknowledged lovers of their own country, will not, surely, desert a first-born and only child, whose efforts will be steadily devoted to their benefit. 
Before we conclude, we deem it our duty to account for the non-publication of THE CAMBRIAN on the 7th instant, the period originally proposed and partially announced throughout the Principality.-The delay arose from the circumstance of the chief part of our Printing Materials having been shipped at Bristol on board the Phoenix sloop, Captain Diamond, bound for Swansea, which was in the first instance detained several days in the former port by contrary winds, and when she at length finally sailed, encountered a violent gale, which forced her into Milford, from whence she did not arrive until the 6th of this month, and we could not obtain our goods until the 12th-the protraction was consequently unavoidable on our part.
 
COLLIERIES AND ESTATE, SOUTH-WALES. 
TO BE SOLD OR LET, 
VERY CONSIDERABLY BELOW THEIR REAL VALUE, 
CERTAIN COLLIERIES on the navigable RIVÈR BURRY, dividing the counties of GLAMORGAN and CARMARTHEN containing by actual survey, inclusive of certain intermixed Lands, at the command of the proprietor of these Collieries, 10,021,000 TONS of net workable COAL, exclusive of pillars, now working upon a small scale, but capable of being immediately placed upon a larger one, and rendered productive to the net amount of from 10 to 15,0001. per annum, at the comparatively trivial expence of from 6 to 10,000l. a Colliery-surveyor of the first character for skill and integrity having made his estimates to that amount; offering to demonstrate their accuracy beyond the possibility of contradiction, and to become himself, if permitted, a sharer in the adventure. 
Together with the best SHIPPING PLACE, and a situation for the erection of SMELTING-HOUSES, &c. on that river, where Vessels of large burthen may lie, and take in, or discharge their cargoes, with safety in all weathers, and at all times of tide. 
Together also with FREEHOLD LANDS, consisting of 843 Acres, partly tythe-free, let at 716l. 7s. 3d. per annum, but valued at 8241 Is. 9d. of all of which immediate possession may be given. The whole will be either sold or let for any term of from 50 to 100 years, upon the most moderate terms.
If any respectable coal, copper, iron, tin, or glass-house company, should be suited by this proposal, which would probably place them at once at the head of their respective concerns, from the great superiority of advantages beyond those possessed by any other company in the kingdom the Proprietor, to evince his own sense of the undertaking, would be happy to embark largely in the adventure. 
So many parties have already expressed their wishes to be admitted partners in it, that not improbably a capital of a very large amount might be raised in the country. 
The present price of Coals on this river is now from six to ten shillings per ton and as a further encouragement to iron-masters, it has been clearly ascertained, that the great range of Iron-stone, not more than ten miles distant from these premises, of the same number of veins and quality as those of Aberdare, Merthyr, Blaenavon, &c. &c. can never be smelted to advantage but at these Collieries. 
None but principals, or agents of the first respectability, will be treated with. The letters of such (post-paid) directed to Mr. Edward Martin, Colliery-inspector, of Morriston, Swansea, Glamorganshire, who has all the Surveys and Sections in his possession, will be attended to and to prevent delays, if the writers will put B.C. (the initials of Burry Collieries) on the outside of their letters, they will be opened and acknowledged in Mr. Martin's absence from home. 
N. B. Coals have been advanced on Swansea River, within these ten years, from 40s. per Swansea Wey, (of ten tons) to 72s. 

GLAMORGANSHIRE.
TO BE LET, 
From LADY-DAY next, 
THE Capital MANSION of BIRCHGROVE, with or without the adjacent FARM and LANDS, situate within five Miles of the Town of Swansea, and very accessible from the two Turnpike-Roads which pass near it.—The House is modern, and its situation, comfort and convenience, are strong recommendations. 
For particulars apply by letter (post-paid) to Mr. Levi Jones, Swansea. January 28th, 1804. 

GLAMORGANSHIRE. 
TO BE LET, 
A FARM of 220 ACRES of ARABLE and PASTURE LANDS, with a good HOUSE and Out-buildings, adjacent to the turnpike road from Swansea to Loughor, sea-ports, at an equal distance from both, about three miles and a half it adjoins three excellent Commons, on which it hath extensive rights. A stream of water runs through it, abounding with Fish, and sufficiently powerful for any works of Tin or Iron, for both of which it is particularly adapted, as being situated near Coal fit for all purposes and in a woodland country, where an ample supply of Charcoal can be assured. 
Particulars, when required, addressed to Mr. Levi Jones, Swansea, will be attended to, post-paid. 

SWANSEA. 
TO BE LET, 
AND MAY BE ENTERED UPON IMMEDIATELY, 
TWO commodious HOUSES, situate in WIND-STREET, replete with every convenience which can possibly be desired each comprising a large under-ground arched kitchen, pantry, cellar, and coal-house, occupying a depth of nearly 40 feet on the ground floor, a capital shop, 25 feet by 16, with two handsome bow windows, having a counting-house adjoining, and a kitchen, pantry, brewhouse, scullery, and pumps of soft and hard water behind on the first floor an elegant drawing-room, of the same dimensions as the shop, a lobby, and two bed chambers on the second story another drawing-room, 16 feet square, a lobby, and three bed chambers on the third floor, an excellent dining-room, a lobby, and three bed-chambers with four good attics above. 
The front of these Premises is handsomely finished with polished brick, supported by free-stone pillars, pilasters, arches, and cornices, with parapet-walls coped with free-stone. The shops, counting-houses, and all the front-rooms, are corniced, and, together with the lobbies and stair-cases, beautifully stuccoed. The best rooms are fitted up with Bath stoves and marble chimney-pieces, and all the others with good grates. Behind each house there is a double coach-house and four-stall stable, both cieled, with hay-lofts over the same, and an inclosed yard, with handsome gates, and a road into Fisher-street.-Gardens may also be had, if required. 

The back rooms command a delightful view of the sea, from which they are not more than 200 yards distant and the premises are situated in the most desirable part of the town of Swansea, being exactly opposite the principal Inn, where the Mail Coaches to and from London and Ireland arrive daily, and within a few yards of the Post-office, Theatre, and Market. 
These Premises are admirably adapted for carrying on an extensive line of business, and the tenants cannot fail of letting any part of the houses they may appropriate for LODGINGS during the summer season, when the town is filled with fashionable company to breathe the salubrious air for which Swansea is so justly celebrated, and to enjoy its warm and cold bathing. Each floor forms a complete suit of rooms for a family, with separate kitchens, and other domestic conveniences.
Further particulars may be had by personal application, or letters, post-paid, to Thos. Williams, Surgeon, Swansea. 

To PRINTERS in general, and more particularly to 
NEWSPAPER PRINTERS. 
A MECHANIC who has CONTRIVED a LETTER-PRESS ENGINE by the power of which two Forms may be worked off at the same time, and upon the same sheet and with which neither skill nor hard labour are required, except the laying on the ink, the method being the same as now practised at all the present Letter presses in Europe Wishes to dispose of its Model. One Man and three Boys will be able to work off the two Forms of a Newspaper in less time than four Men with two Presses could. N. B. The expence for executing a complete Press, upon the Plan of that Model will be less than 30l. the model being one eighth of it, cost only 6 guineas, and is principally Cast-iron. Addres to John Baikie, post-paid, at the Printer's of this Paper. 
AT a MEETING of the MERCHANTS and SHIP-OWNERS, Held in the TOWN-HALL, in SWANSEA, on SATURDAY, NOV. 5,1803, 
WILLIAM JONES, Esq, In the Chair; 
A letter having been read from Major-General GASCOYNE, approving the idea of providing four light FIELD-PIECES for the DEFENCE of the HARBOUR and COAST, (as recommended by a Meeting held June the 26th ult.) and advising it to be carried into immediate effect: 
This Meeting seeing the necessity of immediate and ac- tive exertion, do enter into the following resolutions :— 
1. That they will, at their own expense, purchase FOUR ,BRASS SIX-POUNDERS, with their Carriages and proper appendages, to be placed upon the Hills commanding the Harbour of Swansea and adjacent Coast; and to be under the care and direction of the Commander of the Sea Fencibles, and exercised by a sufficient number of his best Gunners. 
2. That the Most Noble the Lord Lieutenant of the County be requested to apply to the Secretary of War for permission to carry the above Resolution into effect, and to request that proper ammunition be issued for the service of such guns. 
3. That the following Gentlemen is requested to form a Committee for carrying the above Resolutions into effect; and for soliciting the assistance of the Copper-works, Collieries, and respectable Inhabitants of this Town and that any three of them be sufficient to act; viz. Wm. Jones, Dr. I. Wm. Turton, Charles Neville, John Jones, Wm. Grove, and George Haynes, 
4. That Mr. CHARLES NEVILLE be appointed Treasurer. 
5. That a copy of these Resolutions be signed by the Chairman, and transmitted to the Lord Lieutenant; and another to the Commander of the District. WILLIAM JONES, Chairman. 
6. That the Thanks of this Meeting be given to the Chairman. 
Copy of a Letter to the CHAIRMAN from the MARQUIS of BUTE. 
SIR, Cardiff; Nov. 14, 1803. 
"I have great pleasure in informing you, that HIS MAJESTY has been graciously pleased to approve of the very liberal and spirited offer of the Town of Swansea, to provide four Field-Pieces, with ammunition. for the defence of the Harbour and the adjacent Coast. 
"I am. Sir, 
Your most obedient humble servant, 
"BUTE." 
SUBSCRIBERS. Y £ s. 
Harford and Co 30 0 
Birmingham Mining I Copper Company) 30 0 
J. Freeman and Copper Company 30 0 
Messrs. Williams and Grenfel  30 0 
Dr. Turton 21 0 
Corporation of Swansea 10 10 
Wm. Jones, Esq. 10 10 
Capt. R. Jones, officers and men of the seafencibles. 1stsub. 30 0 
Thos. Lott and Co.. 10 10 
George Haynes 10 10 
Phillips and Co. 6 6 
Ch. Llewellyn 2 2 
C. and R. Neville 5 5 
Alex. Raby, Esq. 5 5 
Thos. Lott 2 2 
Arthur and Hockin. 2 2 
Rob. Prance 2 2 
Rees Jones 1 1 
Mrs. M.Thomas 1 1 
Wm. Lewis 1 1 
L. and I. Michael 1 1 
Wm. Grove. 1 1 
D. Perrott 1 1 
David Saunders, sen. 1 1 
Thos. Hughes. 1 1 
Robt. Burrall 1 1 
Mr. Wm.Vaughan. 1 1 
Ph. Jones, Margam. 1 1 
Geo. Russel, Esq. 1 1 
D. Davies, Esq. 1 1 
Dr. Hobbes 1 1 
Rev. Miles Bassett. 1 1 
John Andrews 1 1

          s. d.
Dan. Jones 10 6 
David Frftncis 10 6 
Benj. Rose 10 6 
Mr. Williams 10 6 
Mr. WilVams 10 6 
Rich, Craig 10 6 
Rich. Carves 10 6 
Thos. Alle 10 6 
John Levies 10 6 
David Thomas 10 6 
Dan. Jones 10 6 
Wm. Attwood. 10 6 
Tho. Johnson 10 6 
Edw. Hughes 10 6 
Wm. M. Evans 10 6 
Mrs. Iltid Thomas 10 6 
Wm. Phillips 10 6 
Jos. Davis 10 6 
Mr. Clark, Boat-house 10 6 
Thos. Morgan 10 6 
Edw. David 10 6 
Wm. Spencer 10 6 
James Walters 10 6 
Rev. B. Jones 10 6 
Mr. Carver 10 6 
David Long. 10 6 
Mich. Williams 10 6 
John Edmonds 10 6 
John Flexman 10 6 
Hugh Roberts. 10 6 
Tho. Sylvester 10 6 
Tho. Bowen 10 6 
John Fowles. 5 0
Mrs. Phillips 5 0 
J. Bevan 5 0 
Mrs. Okey 5 0 
Thos. Davies 5 0 
Mrs. Williams 2 6 

Subscriptions received by Mr. CHAS. NEVILLE, Treasurer, High-street. 
Just Published, 
A MEDICAL GLOSSARY: in which the Words in the various Branches of Medicine are deduced from their original Languages, properly accented, and explained in One Volume Quarto, price One Guinea. 
By. W. TURTON, M.D. late of Oriel College, Oxford. The Second Edition. 
Printed for Lackington, Allan, and Co. Temple of the Muses, London and to be had at the Author's House, High-street, Swansea. 
Whatever has a tendency to lessen the labour or facili- tate the knowledge of a difficult science, must be in some degree entitled to attention. These are professedly the objects of the Glossary before us, which appears to have been compiled by the very able and ingenious author with much judgment and research. To the learned and curious a work of this kind must prove highly- valuable, as the sources from which the various terms and idioms in medical language are drawn, are extremely numerous and complicated. The student may also derive great advantage from the present publication, as the peculiar and appropriate meanings of the different technical terms of his profession may be easily acquired by turning to it." 
Analytical Review, Jan. 1798. 
In the Press, by the same Author, 
A GENERAL SYSTEM OF NATURE, &c. 
In Seven large Octavo Volumes. 
The five first Vols. containing the whole of the Animal Kingdom, and the first of the Vegetable, are completed, and may be had at Mrs. Oakey's Circulating Library.- Price 31. 3s. 
Also, lately Published, 
A TREATISE ON COLD & HOT BATHS, 
With Directions for their Application in various Diseases: to which is added, a Letter to his Grace the Manager, and the Governors of the Royal Jennerian Society, on the Introduction and Success of the Cow-Pock in the Principality of Wales. Second Edition. By the Author of the above Works. 
Sold at Mrs. Oakey's and Evans's Libraries, and the different Bathing-houses Price 2S. 
DUTY ON PROFITS, 
ARISING FROM DIVIDENDS AND ANNUITIES IN THE PUBLIC FUNDS. 
NOTICE is hereby given, That an OFFICE is opened at the Old Stock Exchange, for receiving Returns and Certificates from Persons entitled to Dividends and Annuities in the Public Funds. 
All Persons entitled to such Dividends may pay the amount of the Duty thereon, being One Shilling for every Twenty Shillings, into the Bank of England and, by delivering the Certificate of the payment at the Office above mentioned, with an Indorsement or Description of the Account or Accounts, which the Certificate is intended to discharge, the Assessment to be made upon them, on account of the said Dividend, will be discharged without any further trouble to the parties. Office for Taxes, By Order of the Board of Taxes, London, Dec. 23, 1803. MATTHEW WINTER, Sec. 
TIMBER AND DEAL-YARD, SWANSEA. 
THOMAS and LASCELLES 
EMBRACE the earliest opportunity of in forming their Friends and the Public, that they have just imported into the Ports of SWANSEA and CARDIFF, several large cargoes of PRIME BAULK TIMBER, DEALS, FOREIGN BAR IRON, STOCKHOLM TAR, &c. &c. which they are determined to dispose of on such terms as shall ensure approbation. 
LATHS and LATHWOOD of all descriptions. 
FELL PARKER, 
COMMISSION WINE, RUM, & BRANDY MERCHANT, 
FULHAM, NEAR LONDON, 
BEGS leave to inform Gentlemen residing in the Country, he forwards from the West-India Docks, London, to all parts of the kingdom, JAMAICA RUM, ANTIGUA and BARBADOES SPIRITS of the first quality they are imported in puncheons of about 110 gallons each, but they may be accommodated with any size casks they please to order. 
N. B. FELL PARKER has for sale on commission, a parcel of fine VIDONIA WINE, of the Madeira flavour, from the Island of Teneriffe, next island to Madeira; has been imported into this country upwards of three years It is in half hogsheads, and in bottles packed in all size chests, from four to twelve dozen. 
BEAUTIES OF WALES. 
This Day is published, in One handsome Volume, 8vo. 
price 10S 6d. boards, 
THE CAMBRIAN ITINERARY; or, WELSH TOURIST containing an Historical, and Topographical Description of the Antiquities, and Beauties of Wales. Also prefixed, a Welsh Vocabulary Names of all the Inns the Bardic Alphabet and a Map of the Principality, with an accurate Delineation of the Roads, &c. By THOMAS EVANS. 
London Printed for Thomas Ostell, Ave-Maria-Lane. 
This excellent and impartial Work is a most admirable Companion for all who are in the habit of travelling through Wales, and wish to be acquainted with its various beauties." Union Mag. Aug 1802. 
"This performance exhibits a very eligible Companion for those who shall make the fashionable Tour of Wales, and the Vocabulary gives it an advantage beyond any other Book of the kind that we have seen. The Map prefixed is neat and well executed." British Crit. Jan. 1803. 
"Though we have perused most of the Books relating to the Principality, we are more particularly pleased with the Volume before us. It contains so many articles with which the intelligent reader would wish to be acquainted, that we think it well entitled to our approbation." Monthly Visitor, April. 1803. 
For farther recommendation see Anti-jacobin. Monthly Review, European, &c. 

This Day are published, in Two Vols. 8vo. closely printed, price 12s. in boards, 
ANNALS of PUBLIC ECONOMY. Containing Reports of the State of Agriculture, Commerce, and Manufactures, in the Different Nations of Europe, for the Year 1802. Collected by Henry Redhead Yorke, Esq. including a Journal of Travels in Barbary. Communicated to the Editor by James Curtis, Esq. of the Fifth Regiment of Infantry, who accompanied the British Embassy to the Emperor of Morocco, in the Month of May, 1801. 
The object of this Work is to furnish the community with such Information relative to the important subject mentioned above, as may promote individual and national Industry, and perpetuate that zeal for maritime and commercial Superiority, which is acknowledged to be the characteristic of our nation. 
London Printed for Thomas Ostell, Ave-Maria-Lane. 
TO ARTISTS AND OTHERS. 
This Day is published, in One Volume Octavo, illustrated with Plates, price 7s. in boards, 
THE ARTIST'S ASSISTANT; Or, School of Science; forming a practical Introduction to the polite Arts in Painting, Drawing, Designing, Perspective, Engraving, Colouring, &c. with ample Directions for Japan-ning, Enamelling, Gilding, Silvering, Lacquering, &c. and a valuable Selection of Miscellaneous Secrets. Illustrated with Engravings. 
Also, a new Edition of the Art of Drawing in Perspective, made easy to those who have no previous knowledge of the Mathematics. By James Ferguson, F. R. S. In One Vol. 8vo. illustrated with 8 folding Plates, price 6s. in boards. 
London Printed for and sold by Thomas Ostell, No. 3, Ave-Maria-Lane. 
This Day is published, in I vol. 8vo. closely-printed, containing upwards of 400 pages, price 8s. boards, 
THE HISTORY of the CIVIL WARS of GRANADA and of the Factions of the Zegries, and Abencerrages, two noble Families of that city, to the final Conquest by Ferdinand and Isabella. Translated from the Arabic of Abenhamin, a Native of Granada, by Genes Perez de Hita, of Murcia and from the Spanish by Thomas Rodd. 
Also by the same, 
ANCIENT BALLADS, from the Civil Wars of Grana- da, and the Twelve Peers of France dedicated by Permission to the Right Honourable Lady Georgiana Cavendish (now Lady Morpeth). Neatly printed in foolscap 8vo. price 4s. boards. 
London: Printed for and sold by Thomas Ostell, No. 3, Ave-Maria-Lane. 
This Day is published, ELEMENTS of ENGLISH GRAMMAR or, A New System of Grammatical Instruction, for the use of Schools and Academies. By John Dalton, Teacher of the Mathematics and Natural Philosophy, and Secretary to the Literary and Philosophical Society, Manchester. The Second Edition. Printed on good Paper, price 2s. 6d. bound. 
The celebrated author of the Diversions of Purley,' to whom the treatise before us is dedicated, has a disciple in Mr. Dalton, by no means unworthy a master of so much genius and erudition. We have perused his compendious treatise with much satisfaction and we recommend it to all who are engaged in the education of youth of either sex, as a very useful manual in the branch of science of which it treats." 
Monthly Review, July, 1802. 
"This Grammar is dedicated to HORNE TOOKE, and coincides generally with his opinions on the subject. It certainly deserves the consideration of those who devote their attention to philological studies." 
British Critic, June, 1803. 
London Printed for Thomas Ostell, Ave-Maria-Lane. 
This Day is published, in 1 vol. 8vo. price 6s. boards, A TOUR through several of the Midland and Western Departments of FRANCE, in the Months of June, July, August, and September, 1802. With Remarks on the Manners, Customs, and Agriculture of the Country, illustrated with Engravings. By the Rev. W. HUGHES. 
Printed for T. Ostell, Ave-Maria-Lane. 
We scarcely recollect ever to have met with a Tour in France, so full of useful information and amusement as the present. Mr. Hughes thought it necessary to apologise for presenting it to the public they might reasonably lament, had he been persuaded to with-hold it." 
Monthly Register for May. 
VALUABLE SCHOOL BOOKS. This Day is published, printed on a good yellow wove paper, 12mo, price 3s. neatly bound. 
ARITHMETIC, adapted to different Classes, of Learners, but more particularly to the Use of large Schools. In three Parts; arranged in a new manner, and enlivened with numerous original Examples on interesting Subjects with an Appendix, containing four Classes of Recapitulatory Exercises. By Robert Goodacre, Master of a Seminary in Nottingham. 
Also a KEY to the above: containing Answers to every Example in that work the Solution at large of a number of Questions by way of Specimen and the Method of Solving every Example which appeared in any respect intricate. By the Author of the Arithmetic. 12mo. price 35. neatly bound or with the Arithmetic in one vol. price 5s. 6d. bound. 
Likewise TABLES in Arithmetic and Mensuration. Selected by R. Goodacre. Beautifully and correctly Printed in post 4to. size, price 2d. each, or 14s. per Hundred. London Printed for and sold by Thomas Ostell, No. 3, Ave Maria Lane. 
AN IMPROVED METHOD OF BOOK-KEEPING. This Day is published, in One Volume, Quarto, price 7s 6d. in boards, recommended to all Persons concerned in Business, by some of the first Merchants in London, whose Names appear in the Work. 
AN IMPROVED METHOD of BOOK-KEEPING, the result of thirty Years practical experience. By JOHN SHIRES, Accomptant. 
Also, just published, A KEY to R. GOODACRE'S ARITHMETIC. Containing Answers to every Example in that Work the Solution at large of a number of Questions, by way of Specimen and the Method of Solving every Example which appeared in any respect intricate. By the Author of the Arithmetic, price 3s. neatly bound the Arithmetic and Key together, 5s. 6d. Also, a new Edition of TABLES in Arithmetic and Mensuration; selected by R. Goodacre. Beautifully and correctly Printed in pot 4to. size, price 2d. each, or 14s. per Hundred. 
London Printed for Thomas Ostell, Ave Maria Lane. 
HOTTENTOTS. 
January 2d Was published, price only Sixpence. Embellished with Four very striking Portraits (sketched in Group) of the Rev. Mr. KICHERER and the Three Converted Hottentots, who have lately visited London. 
THE EVANGELICAL MAGAZINE for JANUARY, 1804; Containing a brief Account of Mr. Kicherer's successful Mission, and of the Hottentots lately in London Besides the usual Variety of Essays, Letters, Reviews, Obituary, Religious Intelligence (Foreign and Domestic) &c. with a Hottentot Hymn set to Music, Ode on the New Year, &c. &c.—The Profits of the Work in (which sells 12,000 monthly) are devoted to the Beloved WIDOWS of MINISTERS of different denominations, am ??? Three Thousand Pounds already been distributed. 
Printed for T. WILLIAMS, Stationers' Court, London; and sold by all Booksellers, Newscarriers, &c. in the Kingdom. 
Of whom may be had, New Editions of the Works of Dr. Hawker, Rev. R. Hill, Mr. Burder, Mr. Fuller, and other Evangelical Writers in general. 
BEAUTY, HEALTH, and a GOOD SET OF TEETH, Easily to be obtained by using of NEWTON'S RESTORATIVE TOOTH POWDER, Patronised and used by Their Majesties and the rest of the Royal Family. 
MR. NEWTON has the honour to acquaint the Nobility, Gentry, and the Ladies in general of Swansea, and the south of Wales, that being honoured with the patronage and support of Their Majesties, and the rest of the Royal Family, the Lord Lieutenant of Ireland and his Lady, as well as by most of the distinguished Nobility and Gentry in the United Kingdom, and being perfectly sensible of the many obligations he is under to the most eminent of the faculty, in not only using but in recommending generally the use of his Tooth Powder, begs leave, in the most earnest manner, to return his sincere thanks to them and though he is surrounded by the most consummate empirics, (forcing their dangerous nostrums for the Teeth, &c. to be circulated through the kingdoms by the most false and audacious advertisements) begs leave, in the most earnest manner, to caution the public against becoming the dupes of such unprincipled artifices, and to assure them that lie still continues to supply his numerous Venders with his Tooth Powder, genuine, through his only wholesale Agents, Messrs. Shaw and Edwards, No. 66, St. Paul's Churchyard, London, prepared from the only Recipe of that great and learned physician, the late Sir Richard Jebb, M.D. to their present Majesties. It is as pleasant in its use as it is excellent in its effects. It speedily renders the Teeth smooth and white the gums healthful and firm eradicates the most inveterate scurvy in the gums and by using it regularly, according to the printed directions sealed round each box, Mr. Newton, the only proprietor, will forfeit one thousand pounds, if ever an instance occurs of any person having the Tooth=ach, or a Tooth decay, to the latest period of life. 
Mr. Newton hopes by inserting the following letter of a gentleman, well known in Swansea and its vicinity, will prove an ulterior demonstration of the superior efficacy of his Tooth Powder:— 
"Sir Watkin Lewes has received a box of Mr. Newton's Tooth Powder, which was sent him yesterday, being most dreadfully afflicted with the Tooth-ach it afforded him almost instant relief. He was about sending his servant for another, when Mr. Newton's man called with one (in case of a return) as he thinks it the most valuable medicine for the Tooth-ach he ever experienced. The relief Sir W. has received, has induced him to send Mr. Newton one guinea, which he desires Mr. Newton will do him the favour to accept, and shall feel himself particularly happy in recommending all his friends to make use of it for the future. 
Green-street, Grosvenor-square, Dec. 18th, 1803. 
"To Mr. Newton, Great Russell-street, Bedford, square."
 Also, for the Face and Skin, is particularly recommended, NEWTON'S ROYAL SWEET-SCENTED LUPIN SOAP. the only article at present known to make and preserve a beautiful skin prevents the hands and face from chapping in cold weather in hot weather it removes all freckles, sun- burns, and tans is particularly recommended for gentle- men to shave with who have tender faces. Also, 
Newton's Warranted Tooth Brushes, 
made purposely to use with his Tooth Powder. The great complaint of common tooth brushes is, that they are so badly manufactured, that in a few times using the hairs all become loose, as well as very dangerous to use.—Mr. Newton warrants all his Tooth Brushes. 
All the above articles are sold genuine, wholesale only, by Messrs. Shaw and Edwards, No. 66, St. Paul's Churchyard, London and retail by T. Jenkins, at the Cambrian Printing-office and Mr. Flexman, Swansea; J. Bird, Cardiff; W. M. Davis, Merthyr Tidvil J. Daniel, Carmarthen J. Potter, Haverfordwest J. Roden, Denbigh Owen, Welchpool; Mrs. Tye, Wrexham; Griffiths, Ludlow; Salter, Oswestry Griffiths, Bishop's Castle; Allen, Hereford C. Jones, Gloucester W. Pine, Bristol; and by every Medicine Vender and Perfumer in every Town in the United Kingdom, at the following prices :— 
Tooth Powder 2s. 9d. per box. 
Tooth Brushes 1s. each. 
Royal Lupin Soap 1s. each square. 
N. B. Piease to ask for Newton's Tooth Powder, warranted Tooth Brushes, and his Royal Lupin Soap.

Page 2
 
LONDON. THURSDAY, Jan. 19. 
THE invasion of this country by the French has for some time been the general topic of conversation, and various rumours are continually afloat on the subject. That the preparations of our implacable and designing enemy for the enterprise are of immense magnitude, we readily believe; but we have the satisfaction to know, at the same time, that our countervailing efforts are fully proportionate to the danger we have to encounter. It is the opinion of many that the attempt will speedily be made, while others believe it is postponed till the spring. We would by no means, however, encourage any imprudent confidence or relaxation in our exertions to guard against the impending attack. All we would wish to do is, to caution our countrymen against premature and needless alarm to prepare and strengthen their minds against the moment of real danger but not to harrass and perplex their imaginations with confused and exaggerated accounts that have little or no foundation in fact. 
It is surmised that the French have it in contemplation to send a strong squadron from Brest with troops to the East-Indies, in the hope of disturbing our tranquillity in that quarter. Government, it is understood, have intimated their suspicions on this subject to Admiral Cornwallis, who is now blockading Brest. 
Letters from Gibraltar, &c. make grievous complaints of the licence which the French privateers enjoy in the Spanish ports, from which they sally forth and commit depredations on our trade. The case of the Flora, lately captured within sight of Gibraltar and carried into Algesiras, is much talked of. The Flora was there condemned. She had on board 2,800 stand of clothes, besides stores, &c. for Malta. 
Some American papers of a recent date have reached town. An English Guineamen, of 18 guns and 45 men, is stated to have been captured by a French privateer, of 16 guns and 160 men, belonging to Guadaloupe, after a severe action, in which the latter suffered much, and the former had her captain and several men killed. 
An act is proposed in the Legislature of New Jersey, for the gradual abolition of slavery in that state. It provides, that every child born of a slave there, on or after the 14th of July next, shall be free, the male at 25, and the female at 21 years of age. 
It is said that M. Jerome Bonaparte, now in America, is to be appointed French Minister to the United States, and, after being fully invested with the diplomatic character, is to be recalled by his loving brother. Jerome will thus be enabled to return home under the sanction of the law of nations. 
The total amount of the revenue ceded by his Highness the Peishwa to the East India Company, in perpetuity, (in return for their interference in his favour when driven from his capital by the incursion of Holkar, and replacing him on his throne,) amounts, it is said, to the sum of 775,0001. The territory is very contiguous to our own possessions, and is very valuable in point of situation. 
The Queen's Birth-Day. Yesterday being the anniversary of the festival in honour of the birth of our most gracious Queen, who completed her 59th year on the 19th of May last, and who, as it was once elegantly and truly said in the House of Commons, has so lived as to starve the malice of the world," the same was observed with the usual magnificence and loyalty.-At noon her Majesty and the four elder Princesses proceeded to St. James's Palace, where they were met by some of the other branches of the Royal Family, and a very numerous and splendid assemblage of nobility and gentry. On the entrance of the Queen into the Drawing-Room, the performance of the Ode (for which see our last page) immediately began the music from the works of Handel, a-dapted to it by Sir Wm. Parsons. 
Her Majesty, who appeared in good health, and received her visitors with her accustomed good spirits and affability, wore a bright orange coloured satin petticoat, with a border of black velvet, white rich silver fringe round the bottom a drapery of black velvet vandyked, trimmed round with very rich Turkish balvine chains and tassels. An elegant turban and sash of very fine black lace, looped up with silver rolio beautiful silver cords and tassels. The mantle of orange coloured velvet, silver tissue, ornamented with black velvet, and Turkish balvine chains. The whole of this dress had a very magnificent appearance.-The Ladies were very richly dressed, either in gold and silver muslins, or crape and silver. White satins and sarsnets were worn, and several were attired in magnificent Indian dresses, composed wholly of gold. The Princess Elizabeth wore a head-dress of uncommon richness and elegance, representing the head-piece of Britannia, called a casque, composed of white and silver, interspersed with diamonds and pearls.-Her Royal Highness wore in this head-dress eleven white ostrich feathers, of singular beauty. As if in compliment to her Highness, all the ladies present (with the exception of a few), wore very large plumes of ostrich feathers -none less than 4, and many 6 or 7. The hair was universally dressed in the Grecian style, with pearl and diamond combs. The fashionable shoes were of white sarsnet or satin, trimmed with gold and silver rosettes. Diamonds in profusion were worn by all the company, in the form of tiaras, and the Prince's feathers. Necklaces, composed of 3 rows of diamonds, and drop-diamond earrings, were general.—The prevalent colours were purple, scarlet, and yellow; with very rich embroidery of silver and gold.-Caps, were very little worn, except by the elderly ladies. 
The dresses of the gentlemen in general consisted of velvet coats and breeches of the same colour, with a white satin waistcoat; the whole richly embroidered. The prevailing colours were bottle- green and brown. 
The Court broke up soon after five o'clock, when Her Majesty and the Princesses returned to Buckingham House to dinner. His Majesty declined attending the Drawing-Room, not finding himself sufficiently recovered from a recent slight attack of the rheumatism. In the evening their Majesties entertained about 250 of the nobility and persons of distinction with a concert at the Queen's House. 
FRIDAY, Jan. 20. 
Letters of the date of the 4th of December have been received from Lord Nelson's fleet. It was then off Toulon. The Noble Admiral had maintained the blockade of that port during a course of the most tempestuous weather ever known in the Mediterranean, by which his ships had been somewhat strained, but otherwise his fleet was in good condition. 
A letter was received in town yesterday from an officer on board his Majesty's ship Donegal, by which it appears that Sir Richard Strachan's squadron was cruizing off Cadiz on the 3d inst. all well. They had not taken any prizes of consequence, but were in a state of preparation to take immediate advantage of a rupture with Spain, in case that event should happen, which the letter adds, is a matter of general expectation in that country. 
The Princess Amelia, we are sorry to state, is very seriously indisposed; her physicians recommend Her Royal Highness to try the efficacy of the Bath waters. The Duchess of York is also much indisposed. Though a dress was made up for her Royal Highness, she was unable to attend the Court on Wednesday. 
SATURDAY, Jan. 21. 
The brig Speedwell, Lieutenant Robertson, has captured, off Dungeness, Le Hazard, French lugger privateer, of Boulogne, of 6 guns and 34 men. She had taken a sloop from Southampton to London, laden with merchandise, the preceding evening, off Newhaven.-Gazette. 
The Gazette also announces a reward of 100l. for the apprehension of the persons concerned in the attack lately made upon the gaol of Chester, in consequence of one of the volunteers of that town having been pressed and confined in that prison. 
The return of the First Consul to Paris from the coast, is the principal article of intelligence contained in the French papers which arrived last night. What will be his next adventure, is perhaps a mystery even to himself. His repeated journies to the coast, and his frequent boastings that the grand attempt was now at length to be made, clearly demonstrates the uncertainty in which he has for some time been involved. He has for some time been slowly advancing in the conviction that he has entered upon an attempt far beyond his power to accomplish. Perhaps he may now hope, that the many false alarms which he has lately caused to this country, may at last seduce us to look upon the whole as a mere delusion and that our countrymen will in the end be taken unawares, when the wolf does actually invade our fold. In this expectation he will assuredly be disappointed as our means of defence, and our activity to anticipate all hostile attempts, daily encrease in a proportion far beyond his preparations. 
Government (says the Paris papers) has received the most satisfactory intelligence, relative to Admiral Linois' squadron, which was said to have been captured by Admiral Rainier. 
The accounts given in the Dutch Journals, which have reached us to the 11th instant, of the distresses experienced by the people throughout the Batavian Republic, are of a most melancholy kind. Oppressed by the tyranny of the French, exhausted by the enormous price of all the necessaries of life, and sinking under the heavy pressure of taxes and contributions, they despair of all relief, and appear solely occupied in contemplating the wretchedness of their fate. At Amsterdam and Rotterdam, trade and business of almost every kind are completely at a stand. The number of merchant vessels arrived at the former city during the last year, is less by 858, than during the preceding year. 
The American papers, received to the 13th ult. contain little intelligence of interest. The Spanish Minister, considering himself treated with disrespect by the President, is said to have left the city of Washington in disgust. 
The differences between the United States and the Emperor of Morocco have been finally adjusted. Four American frigates were moored before Tangiers, for the purpose of battering it down, in case peace was not agreed to on the terms proposed by America. 
Yesterday was settling day at the Stock Ex change. The funds experienced a further rise, Consols were done at 55 5-eighths, without the dividend, and 57 1-eighth, dividend included. The gradual rise of every kind of stock for some time past, is occasioned by the immense purchases made by the public, which can only be attributed to the great confidence in our national security, notwithstanding the impotent and daily threat of invasion. 
We are concerned to state, that a serious misunderstanding exists between the third company of the Southwark Loyal Volunteers and their Lieut.- Colonel, Mr. Tierney, respecting the filling up vacancies among the officers. The company lately elected their Serjeant-Major to the second Lieutenancy, who was refused by Mr. Tierney, he having previously appointed a stranger; the company hereupon entered into certain resolutions expressive of their right to choose their own officers; the consequence of which was, that the Colonel ordered the company to be disbanded, and the members have resigned their arms into the hands of the proper officer. Mr. Tierney laid the business before Government, and his Majesty perfectly approved the Colonel's conduct. The Secretary at War, in a letter on the subject says, that it was never his Majesty's intention that successive vacancies which might happen amongst the officers of the corps should be filled up in the manner which has been supposed, after the corps was once established; and his Majesty entertains a just expectation, that the good sense, loyalty, and public spirit of the individuals composing the company in question, will induce them to acknowledge the impropriety of the line of conduct into which they have been betrayed. 
The company on Friday returned an answer to this letter, which, in substance, states, that they still conceive the right of electing officers to be vested in the privates, according to the original regulations of the regiment, and therefore cannot acknowledge themselves as having been betrayed into any error; but considering the critical state of the country, are willing to return to active duty, on condition that no man shall be singled out as a ringleader in a cause which was the spontaneous act of all. Here the business at present rests. 
Mr. Erskine has given a detailed and argumentative opinion concerning the laws which regulate the period of the service of the volunteers. He decidedly differs from the opinion of the Attorney General, who asserted that volunteers had no right to withdraw themselves from their respective associations." Mr. Erskine lays particular stress upon the act of the 42d of the King, c. 66, in which it was considered expedient, for encouragement of the volunteer system, to grant exemptions from service in the militia to those who had enrolled themselves, and who were effectually serving in any corps of volunteers; and that Government might know with precision the individuals entitled to such exemptions, effective service was defined by a certain attendance specified in the act, to be certified by a muster-roll transmitted by the commanding officers to the Lords-Lieutenants of counties. That such enrolment was no binding obligation on the volunteers to continue their services, is expressly implied by the 4th section, which enacts, "that there shall be inserted in the muster-rolls the name of every person enrolled in such corps, who since the date of the last muster-roll shall have notified to the commanding-officer his intention of discontinuing his service therein; or who shall have been discharged therefrom on account of non-attendance or otherwise; in order that from the date of such resignation or discharge, they may become liable to be ballotted for into the militia, as if they had never been exempted at all." The subsequent acts, Mr. E. is of opinion, do not alter the construction of the former act respecting volunteers enrolled thereunder. 
Violent Outrage.-Last Sunday, Mrs. Lee, a lady of considerable property, residing in Bolton-row, Piccadilly, was forcibly taken from her house by the Rev. Lockhart Gordon and Mr. Lauden Gordon, brothers, who had dined with her on that day. Her two maid-servants (the footman having been sent out by the Mr. Gordons to call a coach) attempted to rescue their mistress, when Mr. Lockhart Gordon seized them both, and presenting a pistol, swore he would shoot them if they made the least noise or resistance. Having succeeded in getting Mrs. L. out of the house, they put her into a post-chaise which was in waiting within a few yards of the door, the post-boy being ready mounted, and drove off with the greatest speed possible. The servants followed it with screams and cries; but in vain the swiftness with which it drove eluded all pursuit. The servants making this extraordinary circumstance known to Mrs. Lee's friends on Monday morning, Mr. Parkin (the solicitor for the post-office) applied, with the servants, at the Public-office, Bow-street, and Mr. Robinson, the sitting magistrate, issued his warrant to apprehend the Mr. Gordons, and Miller and Atkins, two of the officers, were dispatched in pursuit of the parties. They continued their inquiries during the day without success but on their way to Mrs. Lee's house, at nearly eleven o'clock at night, to see that all was quiet there, they found a gentleman in custody of the watchmen in Bolton-street, who, upon inquiry, proved to be Mr. Lockhart Gordon; he was immediately secured, and a pair of loaded pistols taken from aim. It seems he had returned to Mrs. L.'s house that night in a hackney coach, and having gained admittance into the passage, told the servants he was come for Mrs. Lee's clothes; upon which the footman slipped out, and having obtained the assistance of two watchmen, took him into custody, after an ineffectual attempt to escape. 
Tuesday morning he was brought to Bow-street, and underwent a long examination before Mr. Bond and Sir William Parsons, when the above circumstances were fully established by the servants and several other witnesses. 
During the examination, Mr. Bond had frequently occasion to reprove the prisoner for his indecorous conduct, in interrupting the witnesses, and at last was ofauged to have him removed from the bar till the evidence was gone through, when he was put to the bar again, and the depositions read to him, to which he declined making any defence. 
By the statutes cf the 3rd of Henry the VII. and of 39th Elizabeth, it is made felony,without benefit of clergy, to take any woman forcibly away, with intention to possess her property, or marry her without her consent, or to defile her person. Mr. Parkin, therefore, contended, that it was fair to presume the offence in question came within the meaning of those statutes, and in this opinion Mr. Bond and the other magistrates concurred. The prisoner, on being apprised of the situation in which he stood, said, he was very willing the law should take its course, and that he should readily meet any prosecution on that ground. He was committed for further examination. 
Owing to the active measures pursued by Mr. Bond, Lauden Gordon and Mrs. Lee were secured at Glocester on Wednesday, and with Lockhart Gordon, the clergyman, underwent a long examination yesterday in Bow-street, before the above magistrate and Sir William Parsons. 
Mrs. Lee, after recapitulating the particulars of her being forced from her own house, as already stated, deposed, that the chaise in which she was confined between the two brothers, reached Tetsworth, nine miles from Oxford, in the middle of the night, where, after knocking up the people of the inn, supper was ordered after which Lockhart told her to go to bed, which she did, and under an impression that her life was in danger, permitted Lauden Gordon to come to bed to her. On Monday morning, they all breakfasted together, when Lockhart Gordon observed, she would have no cause to repent the measures that had been taken, for that it would be the object of his brother's life to render her happy and that as  to himself he would adhere to her as long as he had blood in his veins, and he would be one of the best friends she ever had. After breakfast, Lockhart Gordon set off for London and she, at the earnest entreaty of Lauden, went forward to Glocester; where they were discovered at the Bell-Inn, and take into custody by the officer from Bow-street. 
All the evidence against the prisoners not being yet adduced, they were committed for re-examination next Friday. 
Mrs. Leigh seems to be about 30 years of age her figure is delicate and interesting. She is a natural daughter of the late Lord Le Despencer, who left her by will the sum of 40,0001. She afterwards married Matthew Lee, Esq. known in the fashionable circles by the appellation of the "Handsome Lee." From mutual disagreement, they separated about ten years since, and her husband received from Mrs. Lee a liberal annual allowance. 
Lockhart and Lauden Gordon are first and second cousins to the present Earl of Portsmouth. Lauden conducted himself during the examination with temper and propriety; but the behaviour of Lockhart was indecorous as a clergyman, and disgraceful as a man. 

MONDAY, Jan. 23. 
By a respectable merchant who left Rotterdam so late as Tuesday last, we learn that no doubt whatever is entertained by the best informed people in Holland, that the First Consul does seriously intend to carry his menaced project against England into execution; but as to when and in what manner, they are more discreet than to venture any precise or positive opinion. Certain it is, that every preparation to this effect, such as the collection of troops, stores, and shipping, is now carried on with systematic activity, throughout the whole territory of the Batavian Republic; and that the troops, both Dutch and French, are animated by exhortations, and instructed by peculiar exercises, to meet the perils of the enterprise. 
Some apprehensions of insurrection in Holland appear to be already entertained, to guard against which a number of regiments are said to be on their march from Hanover for that country. It is even stated, that the former place is about to be entirely evacuated by the enemy, in consequence not only of the earnest interference of Russia, but also of the serious remonstrances of Prussia.—The differences between Austria and Bavaria, it is also said, are about to be adjusted by mutual concessions, and transfers of territory. 
From Constantinople, we learn, that the tranquillity of Egypt is once more restored, by the acceptance, on both sides, of the conditions by which the Beys, in consideration of their paying certain taxes, are to be restored to their former power.-In some parts of the interior of Turkey the plague is stated to have again made its appearance, but no particulars are mentioned. 
General Burton has been tried by a Court-Martial, for accepting a challenge from an inferior officer, and sentenced to be broke, on the ground of indiscretion. This sentence was confirmed by the King, but the General was immediately after restored to his rank.- Captain King, who sent the challenge, will be tried this day. 
It is reported that it is in agitation to suspend the Slave-trade for five years. 
The unfortunate dissentions which exist in the corps of Southwark volunteers, had nearly produced a duel between Lieutenant-Colonel Alcock and Captain Gunson; the parties were to have met on Saturday morning, but the Police having obtained a knowledge of their intentions, they were both taken into custody, and bound over to keep the peace. 
TUESDAY, Jan. 24. 
The King has been pleased to appoint Lieut.- General William Myers, to be commander of his Majesty's forces serving in the Windward and Leeward Charibbee Island station.-Gazette. 
There is now but too much reason to fear we shall be speedily involved in hostilities with the Spaniards. Letters have been received from Malaga, Cadiz, Bilboa, and other parts of Spain, containing a copy of the following official notice from Mr. Frere, his Majesty's Minister at Madrid, to all the British Consuls and agents for prisoners, &c. throughout that country: 
Sir, MADRID, Dec. 17th, 1803. 
I am directed by the British Minister at this Court to request you would, as soon as possible, give notice to all his Majesty's subjects in your district, to take such immediate precautions as they may deem necessary, to meet the emergence of an approaching rupture between the two countries. 
I am, Sir, &c. &c. 
(Signed) B. FRERE, Sec. of Legation. 
To —— Esq., Consul or Agent for British Prisoners at ———— 
Although Ministers are said to express their fullest conviction of the authenticity of the above letters; yet, on the other hand, the Portuguese and Spanish Ministers in this country are stated to have received information, that the treaty of neutrality between their respective Courts and France was signed two days posterior to the date of Mr. Frere's notice, and, in the opinion of the Spanish Ambassador, upon terms not objectionable to this country. 
Letters were yesterday received in town, of a recent date, from a very respectable commercial house at Petersburgh, which intimate a clear and decided opinion that Russia will take an active part against France, in concert with this country, early in the spring. Whatever foundation there may be in this opinion, the Funds have experienced an elevation for the last few days. Two other causes were in the course of yesterday also adverted fa, as accounting for this effect. It was said that financial arrangements had taken place,which either postponed or wholly obviated the necessity of a loan and last, although not least, some rumours were afloat, that Mr. Pitt was likely soon again to be in office.
 The severe gale of Thursday night last has done considerable damage on several parts of the coast. The channel fleet has felt its full effects, and the Neptune, Dreadnought, Plantagenet, Terrible, and Indefatigable, have been obliged to return to Plymouth. Admiral Cornwallis, it is hoped, has preserved his station with the remaining ships. 
Marquis Cornwallis will, it is confidently asserted, in case of an invasion, take the command of the eastern district under the King. 
There was yesterday a report in the city, that during Bonaparte's last residence at Boulogne, he superintended an embarkation, as an essay and an exercise of his troops. During this trial, he rode on a spirited charger, which he spurred along the beach, and was at times up to the girth in the water. In the course of the bustle and confusion of this scene, his horse got entangled by the cable of one of the gun-boats, and threw the Chief Consul into the sea, from which he was dragged by his attendants. 
A plan, it is rumoured, has been laid before the Minister for imposing a duty on all vessels trading on navigable rivers throughout the kingdom. The total produce of the taxes for 1803, has been no less than £ 30,804,041.2s. 6d. sterling; a produce remarkably exceeding former years. They could not have given this vast amount, had trade, manufactures, and general produce been on the whole much diminished. 
Tnis day in the court or King's Bench, Mr. Erskine obtained a rule for a writ of certiorari to remove into that Court, the conviction of Mr. Dowley, of the Southwark volunteer cavalry, for fines imposed on him on account of absence from drills, &c. The decision of the Court, in this case, will settle the question, whether the members of volunteer corps have a right to resign. 
The publicity of Mrs. Lee, and the extraordinary proceedings of the Gordons, have procured her another violent lover, in the person of a Mr. Underwood, who was so extremely troublesome at her house on Saturday and Sunday, that a Bow street officer was yesterday sent to take him into custody, but Mrs. Lee not coming forward, he was discharged. 
Yesterday Bourke and the Game Chicken fought on Wimbledon Common, for a purse of 100gs. raised by subscription. After 28 hard rounds, the Chicken carried the day, and beat Bourke in so severe a manner, it is supposed he will never be able to fight again. 
WEDNESDAY, Jan. 25. 
We know not whether the enemy have at last ventured to send their whole force to sea, or only a part of it; but they seem to have taken advantage of our ships being blown off the coast by the late gales.- Our squadron has, for these three or four days, been forced to return to the Downs. About noon yesterday a heavy firing was heard at Deal in a S. S. E. direction, and continued when the post set out. 
About 4 o'clock a signal was made from the East Hill station, of the enemy's flotilla being in motion from Boulogne, and endeavouring to get round Blankness. Signals were immediately made to our ships, and they worked out of the Downs with every inch of canvas spread. 
It is not ascertained whether the enemy have put to sea with the whole of their force from Boulogne or whether the enemy's flotilla seen endeavouring to get round Blankness, was a division of their force attempting to get into Boulogne from some other port. The Deal telegraph was at work for some time this morning; but the intelligence it conveyed has not yet transpired. 
A letter from Deal of Yesterday's date says- Captain Owen, always foremost in the hour of danger and necessity, is now crowding every inch of canvas, and the gun-boats and bombs under his command are following his example with the utmost expedition, and doubtless ere morning dawns, our ears will be saluted with the cannon's roar. We anxiously await the threatened arrival of the hostile armament; but we are ready, and rather court than wish to avoid the encounter. Whatever coolness,courage,and zeal indefatigable, can accomplish, may be expected from the union of all those qualities in the commander of L'Im- mortalite." 
The port letters are silent respecting the channel fleet; from which circumstance it appears but reasonable we should infer, that, excepting the four ships known to have come into Pymouth, the whole under the command of Admiral Cornwallis have been able to keep the sea, and probably will do so till relieved by others. 
The Spartiate, of 84 guns, for whose safety fears were entertained, is arrived safe in Beerhaven. We still remain in a state of doubt and indecision with respect to a war with Spain. It is reported, but how truly we cannot decide, that a new plan has been adopted by the First Consul, for the purpose of effecting the invasion of this country. He has dropt for the moment the idea of putting to sea with his flotilla in the face of our squadrons, and his intention is, first to attempt I to disable our ships, and then to put to sea with the flat-bottomed boats, and get footing on English ground before our vessels can be repaired. He waits for the first calm that offers to make a serious attack upon our squadron with an immense number of gun-boats, which are now equipping for the purpose, and manned principally by Genoese, Italians, &c. of whom he has upwards of 6000 at Boulogne at this moment. There is reason to think that, besides the orders issued to counteract Bonaparte's present project, other measures are in contemplation to give us even a greater security than we have now against invasion. 
In consequence of several French privateers having been seen cruizing off Teneriffe, with the view, it is supposed, of falling in with our West-India fleet, the Lords Commissioners of the Admiralty have ordered Admiral Cornwallis to send immediately one of the largest and fastest sailing frigates to cruize off the Western Islands, in order to protect our shipping, and to capture any of the French privateers they may happen to fall in with. The Fisguard frigate has also been ordered to the Canaries, and to stretch from thence to the coast of Africa, in quest of these privateers, should they appear in that quarter. 
Ball cartridges are now issuing to the corps of volunteers at a considerable distance from the metropolis, and even counties supposed to be little liable to attack, such as Somersetshire and Glocestershire, where all, we understand, are half provided with fire arms, and many completely so. 
We cannot offer more satisfactory intelligence to the public, than that of his Majesty's continuing advancement towards recovering from his indisposition. We have the very great pleasure to state, that he was yesterday able to walk in the different apartments of the Queen's House. It is officially announced, that his Majesty will hold a Levee at St. James's on Wednesday next; and that her Majesty will have a Drawing-room on the following day. 
We learn, that it is determined to bring in a bill, on the meeting of Parliament, to declare that the volunteers have the right, and may resign at pleasure but that a new law is rendered necessary for their government hereafter; and therefore to enact, that such of the volunteer bodies as shall continue, must conform to the new rules and regulations which the bill will contain, not only with regard to the right of resignation, which will be taken away, but also as to the election of officers, the attendance on drills, and various other points. 

Yesterday, Francis Smith, convicted at the last session for the murder of Thomas Millwood, at Hammersmith, the supposed ghost, received his Majesty's pardon on condition of being imprisoned one year. 

PRICE OF STOCKS. 
Bank Stock 155 1/2
Long Ann 16 
3 per C. Red 56 1/2 
India Stock. I72 1/4 
3 per C. Cons. 56 1/2 
India Bonds is. prem. 
4 per C 73 
Excheq.Bills 2s. a 3s. prem. 
5 per C, Navy 89 3/8 
Omnium 2 1/4 dis. 
5 per C. 1797 94 1/2 
Lottery Tickets, 19l. 
Dublin Exchange-Dublin on London 17 1/2 a 13.
 
BARRINGTON'S HISTORY of, and VOYAGE to NEW SOUTH WALES, including BOTANY BAY, &c. &c. 
(Dedicated to His Majesty.) 
Next Saturday will be published, price One Shilling, 
No. 1. (to be continued Weekly) of 
THE HISTORY of NEW-SOUTH-WALES, including Botany Bay, Port Jackson, Parramatta, and its dependancies, from the first Discovery down to the present time the Customs and Manners of the Natives Natural History, State of Agriculture, Proceedings of the English Colony, and every interesting particular of the Convicts, and the Country at large.—By George Barrington, late his Majesty's Officer of the Peace for Parramatta. This Interesting Work will be compleated in 26 numbers, and enriched with elegant coloured prints forming the only complete history of the Island ever attempted. Published by M. Jones, No. 1, Paternoster-Row. 
The above Work may be had complete, with the LIFE of the AUTHOR, in 2 volumes, price 27s. in Boards. 
NEW NOVELS. APOLLO LIBRARY, LONDON. 
JUST PUBLISHED, 
By J. F. HUGHES, 
No. 5, Wigmore-street, Cavendish-square, 
THE PIC NIC, 2 vols, foolscap 8vo. 10s. boards. boards. 
RIGHT and WRONG; or the KINSMEN of NAPLES by MARY JULIA YOUNG, niece to the Author of Night Thoughts. 
MOSSCLIFFE ABBEY, a Romantic Tale, in 4 vols. by the same Author. 
AURORA or the MYSTERIOUS BEAUTY by CAMILLA DUFOUR, 2 vols. This novel gives the only authentic account of the Illuminati Society ever published, with all their Ceremonies, Watch Words, &c. &c. 
The MOTHER and DAUGHTER, a Pathetic Tale, 3 vols. 
MARGARET of STRAFFORD, 5 vols. by Madame DE STAEL, Author of Delphine, &c. &c. 
GUTHRIE's GEOGRAPHY, abridged and corrected including all the modern Discoveries, with copious Maps, &c. one thick volume in i2mo. 
CANDID JUNIOR, and Dr. PANGLOS 3 vols. 12s. being a continuation of the celebrated Voltaire's Candid, and the most severe critique on the Manners of the French ever published. 
The TWO MARILLO's; or the MYSTERIOUS RESEMBLANCE 3 vols. 10s. 6d. 
HELL UPON EARTH 2 vols. 8s. by the Author of the Stranger, Pizarro, &c. 
The MONK of HENNARES, 2 vols. 7s. 
IN THE PRESS, BARON DE FLEMING, 4 vols. 
The OPINIONS of CAPTAIN MARK, the French Tristram Shandy, 4 vols. 
DONALBA or, the WITCHES of GLENSHIEL a Scottish Romance, 4 vols. 
VICTOR ALLEN, 2 vols. 
The THREE GIL BLAS, 4 vols. 
The STRANGER of ALGARVA, 3 vols. a Portuguese Romance, by J. H. SARRETT, Author of the Life of Bonaparte, &c. &c. 
The Life, Opinions, and Singular Adventures of ERASMUS SLY, a travelling Pedlar, 6 vols. by the' celebrated CRAMER. 
COMFORTABLE HANDS AND FACE. T JENKINS Printer, SWANSEA, has this • day received a large Supply of MIDDLEWOOD'S ROYAL ABYSSINIAN FLOWER SOAP, which is patronised by the PRINCESS of WALES and the DUKE and DUCHESS of YORK, the Nobility and Families throughout the United Kingdom; and all Europe celebrates its inestimable virtue, which makes the Hands and Face delicately White, Smooth, and Agreeable, in the most intense Frost or Sharp Winds, however rough and unpleasant the Skin may have been. In washing'Young Children, whose delicate skin requires great attention to be preserved in its pure state, its efficacy is invaluable. Also Military and Gen- tlemen in general, exposed to the inclemency of the winter, will prove its efficacy in rendering Shaving comfortable, even where smarting and the most unpleasant sensations have been experienced indeed the estimation in which it stands with the public, is too generally known to need fur- ther encomiums.—Price is. the square. Neat SHAVING BOXES filled with the above Soap, Brush, and on the top copper-plate directions, which, if attended to, will very much assist the tenderest faces.-Price 2S. 6d. ALSO,
HIS ROYAL COSMETIC POWDER has for many years gained the admiration of Ladies in the leading circles of elegance, who universally use and recom- mend it (particularly for the ball-room) as an agreeable and necessary appendage to the Toilet, to make the FACE, NECK, and ARMS, delicately fair and elegant after wasing or perspiration, is. the packet. 
To prevent imposition each packet of Cosmetic, and square of Abyssinian Flower Soap, will be inclosed in a printed paper, signed" y. W. Middlewood." For convenience of Country Venders Messrs. Hendrie & Sons, Thomas, West, and Co. Messrs. Rowneys, Mr. Sowerby, perfumers, Messrs. Howard and Evans, Barclay and Sons, Ching and Butler, Shaw and Edwards, Dicey and Sutton, Mr. Hurst, book- seller, and most wholesale houses, are authorised to supply their friends at the manufactory prices. Orders with money from venders not less than five dozen, to J. W. Middlewood, Abyssinian Flower Soap Maker, High-street, Whitechapel, London, will be sent at the whole- sale price, free of carriage and every expence, to any part of the kingdom.
 
-THE SWANSEA, FRIDAY, Jan. 27.  
The difficulties attending the first publications of a Newspaper being inconceivably great, we trust they will operate in extenuation of whatever errors and imperfections may be observed. Maturity will speedily be attained but, till then, we must rely on the li- berality and candour of our Readers, to pardon ac- cidental or unavoidable omissions. 
SHIP NEWS. 
ARRIVED, The Eagle, Tremithefc, from Penzance Union, Trick, from Clovelly, in ballast Sociable Friends, Gimblett, from Minehead, with sundries Richer, Bird, <1and Petree, Richards, from Padstow, in ballast; Resolution, John, from St. Ives, ditto Renown, Tedvill, from Cork, ditto Happy Return, Truman, from Bristol; Delight, Spurry, from Bridgewater, with sundries Good Intent and Elizabeth, from ditto, with oats Maria, Evans, from Aberthew, with sundries William and Cathe- rine, Phillips, from Bristol, with sundries. 
CLEARED OUT, The Fleet, Blackman, for Ilfracomb, with coal; Betsey, Barrett, for Glocester, with copper and coal; Hope, Edwards, for Ilfracomb Jenopher, Richard, for Falmouth Swan, Bevan, for Truro; Amelia, Ninnis, for St. Ives Fortitude, Vivian, for ditto Betsey, Wilkinson, for Barnstaple Boscastle, Atwell, for Padstow, all with coal; Bee, Knightsbridge, for Chatham, with culm, wrought iron, plates, and cast-iron wedges; Mountgalpin, Nael; Hope, Hicks Marianne, Bond; and Ayre, Grandfield, for St. Ives, Two Friends, Rumson, for Ilfracomb Handy, Williams, for Minehead Jupiter, Grant, for Dartmouth; Penrose, Rogers, for Plymouth Resolution, John, and Rose, Davies, for St.-Ives, all with coals Petrel, Rich- ards, for Padstow and Swallow, Thomas, with sundries James, Pascoe, for, St. Ives; Villers, Dalton, for Truro; M^'ry, Madge, for Bideford Speedwell, Lugg, and Betsy, Ctlrtis, for Ilfra.comb Mariner, Banks, for Fowey Alli- ance, Williams, for Waterford, with coals and Alfred, Crocker, for Waterford, with culm. 
ENTERED OUT, The Cardiff Castle, Jenkins, for Bristol. The brig Betsey, Capt. Slade, from Neath to Magavissey, with coals, ran ashore here, but was got off this morning. The Mines Royal, Sincock, is gone up the river to Loughor to repair some damage received on Llanelly Flats by the late high winds. 
The Thomas and Betsey, Bevan, in ballast, from Bristol bound to the Mumbles, for fish, drove ashore on Portcall Point, between Swansea and Cardiff, on Friday morning last, and went to pieces—one man drowned. 
The Sally, Curtain, from Newhaven to Swansea, has put into Torbay. 
The Racehorse brig, of Carmarthen, was forced on shore in Cornwall by the gale of Thursday last night last. 
Cardiff.—Inwards, the Anglim, Bell, from Memel, with timber and deals the Mary, Fido and Susanna, Evans, from Bridgewater Trial, Bodnam, from Glocester John, Jones, from Newport; Rashlyleigh, Melluish, from Fowey Three Brothers, Davies, from Bristol; and Rover, Chant, from Dartmouth.—Outwards, the Castle of Cardiff, Cle- ments, and ,Fonman Castle, Jones, for Bristol; Treore, Jennings, for Padstow; Industry, Quick, for St. Ive's; and Industrious, Kenmure, for London. Carmarthen.—Arrived, the John Edward, Evan, from Bristol.—Cleared out, the Hero, James; Constant Trader, Evans; aud Ceres, Evans, for Bristol; and Industry, Roberts, for London. 
Tenby.-The Sinton de Maites, Joseph, from Lisbon to London, with fruit, was on the 17th inst. driven into this port by stress of weather. 
Haverfordwest. -Sailed the Perseverance, Richards, with sundries, for Bristol. Bristol.—Entered out, the Emlyn, Morris, for Carmar- then the Eagle, Rowland, and the Martha, Jenkins, both for Fishguard. 
Bristol Imports.— Butter, 537 firkins, 54 casks—Cork 70 c. -Calfskins so bund.—Earthenware 1 crate—Figs (frails) 6;-Goatskins 9 bund.-Hides, (India) 5103—Hemp 22 bund.—Iron 2255 bars-Linen 4 bales—Lemons and oranges 2 cheSts-Linseed 179 bags-Lard 12 trs.—Ox and cow hides 363—Pork 177 bris.—QuUIs 30 packs—Skins i bale—Tallow '18 hhds.—Veils i brl.-Wine 220 pipes 1 hhd. 
The Ann, Bonityne, and the Betty, M'Lachlan, from Limerick to Liverpool, are lost,to the northward of Galway tcrew of the former saved, and that of the latter lost
The Aid, Crannage, from Bristol to Dublin, is lost a few miles from Wicklow an inconsiderable part of the cargo has been saved, but five persons unfortunately perished, viz. Mrs. Crannage, Mrs. Morrison, a Scotch officer's lady, a serjeant's wife of the 18th dragoons, a servant-maid, and the Captain's son,' a fine youth nine years of age. 
The Jane, Weyers, of Plymouth, laden with tar, turpen- tine, &c. from thence to Liverpool, is on shore on Stokes-bay to the eastward of Plymouth, totally wrecked, and the Captain and crew drowned. 
The Sally, Brown, of Liverpool, bound to Malta, &c. with bale goods, is on shore at St. Mawes with loss of rudder and other damage, and will be obliged to take the cargo out to get her off. 

On Thursday night and Friday morning last we experienced a most tremendous gale of wind, which exceeded in fury anything of the kind within recollection. The tide being out, the shipping received but trifling injury. Some vessels ran ashore at the Mumbles, which have since been got off with inconsiderable damage. The streets of the town exhibited a distressing spectacle at the dawn of Friday, being covered with tiles, slates, &c. scarcely a house having escaped uninjured. Several chimnies were blown down, but providentially no lives were lost. It would greatly exceed the limits of a newspaper to particularise the mischief produced by the devasting element: we have received accounts from various quarters of Wales, and the neighbouring counties, of its melancholy effects-many cottages have been destroyed, houses and other buildings unroofed, ricks dispersed, large timber-trees torn up by the roots, &c. &c. but, amidst the general ravages, it will be extremely gratifying to the feeling mind to learn there has been only one or two instances of persons having perished. 
Here as in other ports, the storm was preceded by an uncommon agitation of the sea, which seemed to indicate a surprising concussion of nature. The Brecon Mail-coachman was blown off his box over a bridge into the river Tarrellt; and a meteor also appeared, extremely bright, over the outskirts of Brecon. 
In Hereford and visinity the buildings have materially suffered. 
In Stoke Park, Herefordshire, 180 oak timber trees were torn up by their roots, and many others in Horn Park, the seat of the Duke of Norfolk. 
A farmer in the parish of Goodrich, near Ross, had an immense number of trees broken to pieces and Mr. Hodges, of Landoga, near Monmouth, had a row of very fine fruit-trees torn up by the roots -several of which last season produced a hog-shead of cyder each. In short, there are few orchards which have escaped the ravages of the tempest. 
Considerable damage was done in the town and neighbourhood of Shrewsbury; many chimnies were blown down, houses unroofed, large trees torn down, outhouses and stacks unthatched, and a variety of other injuries sustained, but no lives lost. 
It blew so violent at Stapleton, that it forced down a part of the wall at the French prison, in consequence of which, one of the Royal Bristol light horse was sent off, express, to that city and a guard of fifty men arrived in the space of three or four hours. 
Great damage was done to the roofs of several houses and other buildings in the city of Glocester. -At Worcester, a fatal accident was occasioned by a stack of chimnies falling on the roof of a house occupied by Mr. Harris, attorney, in Edgar- street great part of the roof was forced into one of the upper rooms, were the nursemaid was in bed with two children under her care, and who was instantly killed by a beam falling upon her neck; but the children were most providentially taken out of the ruins, without having sustained any material injury. 
Swansea Assembly, last night, exhibited, as usual, a numerous and elegant display of company. 
On Monday evening the Llanelly, Assembly commenced for the winter season, under the direction of H. Fragoin and A. Raby, Esqrs. which was numerously attended by the fashionables of the town and neighbourhood. 
Thursday last Mrs. Carleton opened her elegant New Theatre at Milford. 
The Cardiff troop of yeomanry cavalry were reviewed on Saturday last, in Cardiff Castle, by Colonel Wardle, the Inspecting Field Officer of the district, who manifested the fullest approbation at their appearance, and the spirited manner in which they performed the different manoeuvres, particu- larly the last charges—In addressing himself to the commanding officer, the Colonel observed that had they been a regular regiment, much less a provincial trroop, they would do honour to his Majesty's service, and that he should report them as fit for immediate duty.The weather was remarkably fine during the review, and the number of spectators was immense, (it being market-day) as the Marquis of Bute had given orders to have the Castle gates thrown open, that every person who chose it might be gratified without restraint. The ladies were accommodated with some of the rooms in the Castle.—The Colonel is now in Monmouthshire, Inspecting the corps in that county. 
Most of the Welsh corps of volunteers have now undergone Inspection and, to their honour be it. stated, the Cambro-Britons have been found inferior to none in appearance, proficiency, and zeal for the glorious cause in which they have embarked. 
Head-Quarters, Woodland-Castle, Jan. 1804. 
Extract of a circular letter to the Gentlemen commanding Volunteer Corps, under the inspection of Col. G. Warde. 
"It is absolutely necessary that the diffidence attached to an appearance in a new character should be got thebetter of, and that each officer habituate himself to take the command, and give the words distinctly and audibly, which may at the moment be the duty of his situation, in order that the men, by seeing them, qualified, may acquire confidence in their officers. 
"It is desirable that the district of country containing your corps should be so subdivided as to coDtain a squad, which should, in as much as possible, be placed under the superintendence of a corporal, who should use his utmost ,endeavours to bring the men, both in arms, (if left whh them) accoutrements, and clothing, as clean as possible to their private parade and those squads under the further superintendance of serjeants in like manner appointed, (to one or more subdivision districts, according as their numbers will allow) who is to inspect the private parade, call the roll, and prepare a field return for the signature of the com- manding officer of the troop, (or company) after which the officers to inspect their companies in sufficient time to take their posts, and march the men to the general parade at least a quarter of an hour before the time appointed. 
Silence is an essential to a soldier. 
That the men present low enough is particularly to be attended to, especially the rear ranks, who are most in the habit of neglecting so to do it should be explained to them, that a ball striking the ground may rise again to effect, which can never happen to one fired in the air. 
Great care should be had to the well returning the ram- rods, otherwise, when the troops come to use powder, they will be blown away, to the great danger of spectators and on service, to the loss of the use of so many arms, and consequently men. 
GEO. WARDE, Col. on Staff." 
The Shrewsbury volunteers were presented with their colours, last week, by Lady Oakley.—A ball was given on the occasion at the Lion rooms, during which, some wicked wag, by violently striking the cieling of an apartment underneath, caused great confusion among the company, who were impressed with an apprehension that the floor was giving way.—A reward of 50 guineas has, how- ever, been offered for his discovery and conviction. 
The three troops of Shrewsbury yeomanry cavalry have made an offer of being embodied for a week; and they are to march for Ludlow on the 6th of February, for the purpose of acquiring due energy in their training by the opportunity of acting in a body. The Earl of Dysart has clothed, at his own expence, 600 volunteers, raised on his own estate in Cheshire. The patriotic Earl has also enrolled 500 of his tenantry in Suffolk, whom he also means to clothe. 
Lady Grosvenor has generously presented the Flintshire militia with 265 flannel waistcoats. 
On Saturday evening last, as two servants of Mr. Rowland Hopkins, of Sully, were teaching each other the manual exercise with a fowling- piece, which unfortunately happened to be loaded with duck shot (though totally unknown to either), the one who gave the word of command Present! Fire! received the contents of the piece, and the shot entering his left ear, took it off, scalped a part of the skull, and came out at the back part of the head.—The man is living, and, much to the credit of Mr. Vaughan, surgeon, of Cardiff, is likely to do well. 
Thomas Wyndham, Esq., M.P., has generously given five guineas to the prisoners in Cardiff goal, which was expended in meat, potatoes, &c., and Mr. R. Griffiths, surgeon to the prison, humanely distributed a sheep and plenty of potatoes amongst them on Christmas-day. 
At the last Cardiff Quarter Sessions, John Pugh and David Jones, footman and groom to S. Homfray, Esq., were convicted of stealing porter out of their master's cellar, and sentenced to be transported for seven years an example which, it is hoped, will tend to prevent similar depredations in future. 
Glocestershire.—The annual and public examination, at the Rev. Dr. Jones's school, Redland, near Bristol, took place on the Monday previous to the recess. The senior boy having delivered an appropriate and elegant address, in Latin verse, the higher classes were critically examined in the following authors by the Rev. Dr. Drought, S. T. P. Trin. Col. Dub. and the Rev. Thomas Johnes, A.M.; and in justice to the young gentlemen, we add, that they acquitted themselves with much credit. Crooke, in Demosthenes de Corona, and Odes of Pindar. Williams, Farquarson, Wood, and Lloyd, in Demosthenes, Phillippic the 1st, and Odes of Horace, lib. ii. Salisbury, Monck, Ward, Grosett, Davies, W. Williams, Yorke, and Needham, in Homer II, lib. 2, and Virgil, Æn., lib. 6. J. Needham, Gollop, Rolph, H. Williams, and Montgomery, in Collectanea Graeca Minora, and Virgil's Bucolics. 
We have copied the preceding article with great pleasure, as we perceive in it the names of young gentlemen from the Principality, who cannot fail, we hope, from so classical an institution, to become eminent and useful characters in their native country. Dr. Jones, who conducts this seminary, is the same person, we believe, that was some years ago, elected master of the Free Grammar School of Carmarthen, whose printed proposal at that time for erecting a College, we remember to have seen and as the plan was liberal and extensive, embracing the Mathematics, and Philosophy, as well as the Belles Lettres, we lament that it was not carried into execution. 
The following circumstance, though not of very recent date, is nevertheless deserving of notice, as it shews that Welsh Seamen are no less distinguished by intrepidity, in the moment of difficulty and peril, than their English Brethren 
Brixham Quay, Torbay, Jan. 10. A large coasting sloop, called the Dick, of Chester, Abel Davies, late master and owner, laden with slate, from Caernavon bound to Portsmouth and Chichester, is just arrived here. She was boarded, and taken last Saturday morning, about 11 o'clock, two miles off the Runnel stone, by a boat armed and belonging to a French brig privateer then about four miles from them it being fine calm weather, they took Mr. Davies, the master and owner, with all the crew, (except the mate) out of her, and put them on board the privateer the mate was left on board the sloop with four Frenchmen. The privateer then boarded and took four brigs off the Land's End, three of which were laden, supposed from Bristol or Liverpool, and the other in ballast, which she sunk a little to the westward of the Wolf Rock. -The privateer, on her leaving France, had nearly 100 men, chiefly Danes and Swedes, but had taken so many prizes, that she became short handed and stood away for France with her prizes; and the mate of the Dick says, he is afraid they are safe arrived at Morlaix, for she was in sight of that port, whenthe wind flew round to the southward, and it blew a vioient gale, which split the Dick's sails. The mate then told the Frenchmen that he was well acquainted with a port under their lee, and unless they would give the helm to him, he said, every soul of them would perish they consented, and he bore away for England. He then enticed them to go below, make a good fire, and take tea, and when they were down, he kept them there, having previously secured a musket and hanger, and this morning brought her safe into Torbay. The Nemesis frigate has laid claim to the Dick. 
The drying-house belonging to E. Shepard, Esq. of Uley, in Glocestershire, was destroyed by fire last week, supposed to have been occasioned by the overheating of the flues, one of which bursting, communicated the fire. to the timber.—The cloth destroyed is estimated at 1500l. value, but the whole was insured. 
Very early on Friday morning a fire broke out in the workshop of Messrs. Heywood and Belshaw, machine makers, In Manchester, which was totally consumed, together with a large quantity of machinery, &c. The weather being extremely tempestuous, the flames threatened destruction to the whole neighbourhood, but by the active assistance which was rendered, the damage was confined to the premises where the fire began. 
A meeting was last week held at Birmingham, for the purpose of forming a Society for the detection and punishment of fraudulent bankrupts, swindlers, &c., and for preventing the relations, friends, or accomplices Of bankrupts, being appointed trustees. The meeting was numerously attended by the principal manufacturers and tradesmen, and a committee appointed to draw up the rules and regulations of the society.-We understand it is the intention of this society to establish their system upon a basis equally liberal and extensive; connections for the purposes of information will be formed not only in London, Bristol, Liverpool, Manchester, &c., but also in Germany, Russia, Spain, Portugal, America, and other places where a reciprocal interest may arise to the parties engaged in the correspondence. 
ARMY PROMOTIONS. 
Royal Glamorganshire Militia.—R. Aubrey, Esq. to be Colonel; H. Knight, Esq. to be Lieutenant-Colonel; T. Edmondes, to be Major; R. M. Hansard, N. Price, J. Sheldon, R. Morgan, J. Robinson, W. Goodrich, C. Cal- land, T. Smith, Esqrs. to be Captains; J. Langley, gent. to be Captain-lieutenant; R. Bates, J. M. Cottle, T. Tho- mas, J. Norcott, R. S. Redman, A. Chambers, J. Pritchard, W. Langley, W. Thomas, to be Lieutenants; J. Home, T. Jones, Gents, to 1^ Ensigns; M. Irving, Gent, to be Adjutant; J. Alexander, Gent, to be Quarter-master; W. Hopkins, Gent. to be Surgeon; T. Thomas, Gent. to be Assistant-Surgeon J. Langley, to be Paymaster; j. J. Bassett, C. Calland, J. Capper, H. C. Cotton, R. Craw- shay, R. Davies, T. Edmundes, W. Goodrich, E. Hawkins, S. Homfray, T. Jones, D. Jones, W. Lewis, J. H. Lloyd, T. Lockwood, M. Markham, C. Smith, W. Taitt, T. Tho- mas, jun. 1. Thomas, W. Vaughan, G. Warde, R. Wil- liams, J. Wood, jun. G. Wynch, Esqrs. P. Edwards, B. Pall, J. Hunt, R. Rickards, Clerks, to be Deputy Lieu- tenants. 
Fishguard Volunteers.—D. Thomas, Gent. Lieutenant, vice D. Thomas, appointed Adjutant M. Davies, W. Lloyd, R. Watkins, Gents, to be Ensigns. 
Montgomeryshire Volunteer Legiolz.-Infantry. Devereux Milton, Gent. to be Ensign Richard Farmer, Gent. to be Adjutant Edward Jones, and John Ford, Gents, to be Surgeon. 
Cavalry. William Owen, Gent. to be Surgeon. 
Royal Denbighshire Militia.—Major John Lloyd Salisbury, to be lieut. -colonel; Capt. John Powell Foulkes, to be ma- jor.- To be captains, John Maddock Jones, Charles Gethin Kenrick, Richard Parry, Richard Butler Clough, Foster Cunliffe, and Richard Lovett, Esqrs. To be lieutenants, John B. Carruthers, John Davies, H. Nash Bromwich, Stephen Nicholls, George Watkin Kenrick, Thos. Brown, and David Lloyd, Gents.-To be 2nd lieutmalzts, Robert Perrott, H. R. Griffiths, M. Nelson, and E. P. Davies, Gents.-To be quar- ter-master, Thomas Parry, Gent. 
Herefordshire Militia.-Geo. Lord Rodney, to be lieut. 
Shropshire Volunteers.—Adjutant F. Quarme, to be lieut.; iNoei uoyd, Gent. to be Ensign Arthur Downes, Gent. to be adjutant, vice Quarme. 
Monmouthshire Vohmteers.—Reverend T. Leyson, to be Chaplain H. M. Hawkins, Gent. to be Surgeon. 

MARRIED. 
Lately, Charles Smith, Esq. of Guernllwywith, to Miss Barber, of Swansea. At Margam, Glamorganshire, the Rev. William Pritchard, of Callenna, to Miss Llewellyn, of Bromvill. Henry Wise, Esq. of Caldicot, to Mrs. Hoggard, of Black Rock, Monmouthshire. 
DIED. 
Thursday last, much lamented, John Vaughan, Esq. of Golden Grove, Lord Lieutenant of the County of Carmarthen.-A Situation which he always filled with universal satisfaction.—But the principal object of his Life was to make those around him happy and the comforts of his numerous Tenantry occupied a considerable portion of his attention. Residing the greatest part of his time in the country, he attended much to the improvement of Agriculture was always open to the call of Humanity, and indigent and unprotected Merit never went unrewarded. His political principles were strictly constitutional; dissi- pation was not a feature in his Character, and it may be truly said that he entertained his Friends with ancient Hospitality. 
The Farmer, the Peasant, and in short the Coun- try will have to deplore his loss, but his Memory will long exist in the hearts of all. 
At Tenby, suddenly, on Thursday night last, the Hon. Mrs. Ackland, sister to Lord Viscount Hereford. Last week, at her house in Spring Gardens, Carmarthen, Mrs. Howell, relict of the late Thomas Howell, Esq., attorney-at-law, of Swansea. 
On Saturday last, at Cowbridge, Mr. Edward Wilkins, late of Lantwit Major, who had been many years in the East and West Indies. His death was occasioned by the bursting of a gun, which had been loaded for some time, and could not be discharged, owing to the badness of the flint unfortunately he applied a lighted match to the touch-hole, and the gun went off, burst, and tore his hand in so dreadful a manner, that it mortified, and brought on a locked-jaw, which terminated his existence.-He was upon the point of again going abroad, and had taken leave of his friends, with the intention of setting out on the day after the fatal accident happened. 
At Denbigh, Arthur Bennet Mesheim, Esq. Lieutenant in the Denbigh Foresters. 
Last week, Mrs. Jones, of Wind-street, Swansea, mother to J. Jones, Esq. of St. Helen's. 
Mr. Charles Lewis Taylor, of Chepstow, aged 78. 
Mr. Joseph Were, late wholesale linen-draper in Broad- street, Bristol.—Mr. William Daniel, one of the building surveyors of that city. At Ludlow, in her 75th year, Mrs. Humphreys, relict of the late Charles Gardner Humphreys, formerly of Montgo- mery. 
At Hereford, Mrs. Butler, relict of the late Bishop of that diocese. 

HIGH WATER ON SWANSEA BAR (For the ensuing Week.) 
Days. 		Morning. 	Evening.     Height.     
		H.     M.     H.     M.     F.     J. 
Saturday 28     7     0       7      2     16     3 
Sunday   29     7     20      7     38     16     6 
Monday   30     7     56      8     13     16     2 
Tuesday  31     8     30      8     47     15     6 
Wednesday 1     9      3      9     20     14     8 
Thursday  2     9     36      9     55     13     6 
Friday    3    10     14     10     54     11     11 

TO CORRESPONDENTS. 
The Parody from Gray in our next. 
Communications from our Holywell Correspondent will always be acceptable. We have, for the present, omitted his last favour, on account of the extraordinary mildness of the season. 
COUNTRY MARKETS. 
SWANSEA. Wheat 6s. 9 1/2d. Barley 3s. 5d. Oats 2s. 5Jd.
CARDIFF. Wheat 16s. to 18s. per bushel of 20 gallons. Barley 8s. to 8s. 6d. per ditto. Oats 9s. per bushel of 32 gallons. 
COWBRIDGE. Wheat 6s. 6d. to 7s. Barley 2S. 10d. to 3s. 2d. Oats 2S. to 2S. 4d. 
BRIDGEND. Wheat 6s. to 7s. Barley 3s. to 3s. 4d. Oats 2s. 10d. to 2S. 4d. per Winchester bushel. 
NEATH. Wheat 8s. 6d. Barley 2s. Oats 2S. 4d. to 2s. 6d.
CARMARTHEN. Wheat 6s. 6d. to 7s. Barley 2s. 6d. Oats 2s. to 2S. 2d. per Winchester bushel. Butter in casks 11d. to 11 1/2d. per pound. Fresh ditto 1s. 6d. per pound of 24 ounces. 
LLANELLY. Wheat 6s. od. to 7s. Barley 2S. gd. to 3s. per Winchester bushel. Cheese 21. 2s. per cwt. 
LANDOVERY. Wheat 9s. od. Barley 3s. 6d. Grey Peas 5s. od.-per bushel of 10 gallons. 
TENBY. Wheat 8s. per bushel of 10 gallons. Barley 4s. Oats 2S. 4d. per Winchester bushel. 
HAVERFORDWEST. Wheat 7s. to 8s. Barley 3s. to 3s. 6d. Oats 2S. to 2S. 6d. per strike of ten gallons. 
SHREWSBURY. Wheat 6s. iod. Barley 3s. 6d. Peas, 6s. 6d.—per bushel of 38 quarts. Oats 5s. 3d.-per cus- tomary measure of 57 quarts. 
HEREFORD. Wheat, 6s. 11d. Barley, 3s. 6d. Oats, 3s. 9d. Beans, 6s. 3d. Peas, 6s. 3d.-per customary measure of 10 gallons. 
WORCESTER. Wheat 5s. 10d. to 6s. 3d. Barley 3s. to 3s. 4d. Beans 5s. 3d. Pease 5s. 4d. to 5s. 8d.—161 pockets of Hops were weighed in this Market last Saturday: prices 41. 15s. to 51. is. per cwt. 
GLOCESTER. Wheat, best, 7s. od. second, 6s. 3d. third 6s. 3d. Beans, 5s. od. Oats, 3s. od. Barley, 3s. 2d. Peas, 7s. od.—per customary bushel of 9 1/2 gallons. 
DEVIZES. Wheat 48s. to 55s. Barley, 22s. to 24s. Beans, 36s. to 40s, Oats, 20S. to 24s. per quarter. 

LONDON MARKETS. 
MARK LANE, JAN. 23. 
Our market has not been furnished with any great supply of Wheat to-day, and the runs being generally coarse, caused fine samples to be sought after with much avidity, which fully maintained last Monday's prices the ordinary sold heavily, and hardly obtained last currency. We find little fluctuation in Barley and Malt, hence the prices remain nearly as last week. White Peas and New Tick Beans have rather declined but good old Horse Beans keep their price. We have some foreign Oats in fine samples sold for rather more money than last Monday. Current prices of Grain per Qiiarter as under:- 
Wheat 36s to 54s od 	Polands 25s to 26s od 
Rye 29s to 315 od 	White Pease .36s to 43s od 
Barley .205 to 24s 6d 	Grey do 30s to 355 od 
Malt 51s to 57s od 	Beans .oos to 40S od 
Oats 20s to 245 od 	Tick do 26s to 305 od 
Price of FLOUR. 
Fine Flour, per sack 45s to 48s 
Seconds, per sack 40S to 45s 
Jan. 25. 
The late blowing weather has prevented the arrival of grain expected. Wheat of the first quality continues to keep present prices. Fine Dantzic fetches 60s. but much of very ordinary quality is more than the demand, and has a slow sale. The Malt trade is exceedingly dull, at is. and 2S. less price, as are Peas of both descriptions, and Tick Beans. Good Oats have ready sale, and readily maintain the prices. Flour as on Monday. Fine American 33s. to 34s. per barrel of i cwt. 3 qrs. 
Average Prices in 
ENGLAND and WALES. 
Wheat.51s 10d Barley 23s 8d Beans .36s 6d 
Rye 33s 5d Oats 21s 2d  Pease .41s 1d 
Price of SEEDS. 
Red Clover 46s to roos per cwt. 
White ditto. 70s to 126s do. 
Trefoil 20S to 65s do. 
Carraway. 40s to 65s do. 
Coriander 14s to 18s do. 
Turnip 20s to 32s per bushel. 
White Mustard Seed 10s to 14s do. 
Brown ditto 12s to 16s do. 
Canary 7s to gs do. 
Rape Seed-361. to 391. per last. 
Price of MEAT.—To sink the offal, per stone 81b. 
SMITHFIELD. 	NEWGATE & LEADENHALL. 
Beef 4s 6d to 5s 8d Beef 3s 8d to 5s od 
Mutton 5s od to 6s od Mutton 4s od to 5s od 
Veal 6s od to 8s od Veal 5s od to 7s od 
Pork 4s od to 5s od Pork 4s od to 5s od 
Lamb os od to os od Lamb os od to os od 
Beasts at Smithfield, about 2,300—Sheep & Lambs 11,500. 
Price of TALLOW. 
Town Tallow 005 od to 80S od 
Russia do. candles. 76s od to 78s od Do. 
soap 005 od to 73s od 
Melting Stuff 62s od to 64s od 
Ditto rough oos od to 44s od 
Graves oos od to 14s od 
Good Dregs. oos od to 12S od 
Yellow Soap 84s. od.—
Mottled 925. od.-
Curd 96s. od. 
Price of Candles per doz. 12S. 6d.
-Moulds 13s. 6d. 
RAW HIDES at LEADENHALL.
—Stone 81b. 
Hides 3s 8d to 4s od 
Heavy Calf, each 10s 6d 
Middling 3s 4d to 3s 6d 
Horse Skins. 14s to 16s od 
Ordinary 35 od to 3s 2d 
Lamb Skins 25 od to 3s 9d 
Sheep Skins os od to os od. 
Price of LEATHER at LEADENHALL. 
Butts, 501. to 56I. each 2od to 21 Jd 
Ditto, 601. to 651. each 22d to 23d 
Merchants' Backs igd to 2od 
Dressing Hides 22d to 24d 
Fine Coach Hides 24d to 25d 
Crop Hides, for cutting 2id to 22!d 
Flat Ordinary 2od to aid CalfSkins, 30 to 4olb. per doz. 29d to 33d 
Ditto, 50 to 6olb. per doz 28d to 32d 
Ditto, 70 to 8olb 28d to 3od 
Small Seals, Greenland, per lb. 42d to 45d 
Large, ditto, per doz. 100s to 140s 
Tanned Horse Hides 18s to 30s each. 
London Importations last Week.—Almonds 92 cwt. Brandy 2929 gallons, Cheese 40 tons, Coffee 1088 cwt. Flax 23 tons, Gin 5064 gallons, Hemp 58 tons, Hides (Ox) 4814, Iron 30r tons, Oats 5211 qrs. Rum 13922 gallons, Sugar 44280 cwt. Tallow, 8 tons, Tobacco 484977^33. Wheat 548 qrs. Wine (Port) 18447 gallons. 

GLAMORGAN. TWO THOUSAND POUNDS ready to be .L advanced on MORTGAGE, in two sums of 1000l each. Apply to Messrs. Llewellyn and Morgan, Solicitors, Neath. 
To PARENTS and GUARDIANS. WA N T S a SITUATION a middle aged single GENTLEMAN to accompany One or Two YOUTHS of Genteel Fortune intended to Travel on the Continent, or throughout Europe, either during the War or after Peace. The Advertiser, upon enquiry, will be found duly qualified and worthy of such a TRUST, both in points of Morality, and Education in every branch of Literature and Science Having a small Income, Emolument shall not be attended to, on his part. For particulars please to direct (post-paid) to Mr. Alex. Dewarr, at the Cambrian Printing-Office, Wind-street, Swansea, Glamorganshire. 
FOR SALE, A Cargo of very Prime WHITE and RED A Cargo of very Prime WHITE and RED HERRINGS, imported from the ISLE OF MANN. By CHAS. and RICH. NEVILLE. High-street, Swansea, Jan. 24, 1804. A STEAM-ENGINE. TO BE SOLD BY PRIVATE CONTRACT, 
A STEAM-ENGINE, made by Messieurs Boulton and Watt, (entirely new, having never been erected,) of an improved construction, being a twenty- horse power, with rotative Shaft, Balance Wheel, and Sun and Planet Wheels. The Cylinder is twenty four inches in diameter. The Engine is sufficient for working the Machinery of an extensive Manufactory, or will turn four pair of 4-feet mill stones. Also to be disposed of; Capital Timber prepared for the working and spring Beams, and iron and wood work for the Cistern. An upright Mill Shaft, four Wallowers with 44 cogs in each, a Spur Wheel to carry 84 cogs, four Nutts to carry 42 cogs each, a Fly Wheel to carry 60 cogs and nutts, with other materials for erecting a Corn Mill: Likewise 3 pair of 4-feet French Burr Stones, quite new, and a small quantity of French Burrs. For further particulars enquire of the Printer. 
SWANSEA, GLAMORGANSHIRE. 
TO BE SOLD BY AUCTION, By Mr. LLEWELLYN, WITHOUT RESERVE. At the Red-Lion, on the Quay, on Tuesday, the 14th day of February next, between the hours of four and six in the afternoon, or in the mean by Private Contract. THE HOY OS*lf^ H0Y Burthen per register 198 Tons, foreign built, now lying at the Brewery Wharf, with all her Materials and Stores. For particulars, or view of the said vessel and her materials, apply at the Counting house of William Grove and Son, Castle Bailey-street. 
GLAMORGANSHIRE. 
TO BE SOLD BY AUCTION, At the sign of the SHIP, in the borough of LLOUGHOK, On Saturday, the 24th day of March next, ALL that MESSUAGE, TENEMENT, and J'TL LANDS, called TIR CAE PEN Y COED, with the three adjoining COTTAGES and GARDENS, now let to Mr, Rich. Boyner, and situate in the borough of Lloughor. The Lands abound with Coal, which may be wrought by level and from their contiguity to Burry River, are pecu- liarly eligible for the erection of a Glass-House, or Smelt- ing Furnaces. For particulars apply at the Office of Messrs. Thomas and Phillips, Swansea. 
VALUABLE TIMBER 
FOR THE NAVY AND OTHER WORKS. 
TO BE SOLD BY PRIVATE CONTRACT, THREE Lots of TIMBER, situate in the county of GLAMORGAN, of the description hereafter. Lot i. (Numbered A.)—Consisting of 422 OAK TREES, growing at Pwllgwain, in the Parish of Lantrissent. Lot 2. (Numbered B.)—Consisting of 480 OAK TIM- BER TREES, and 36 CYPHERS, growing at Penrhwy- gwynt, in the parish of Lanwonna. Lot 3. (Numbered C.)—Consisting of 256 OAK TIM- BER TREES, growing at Penrhiwkeibir and Wern Coch, in the same parish of Lanwonna. The above Timber is of the best quality, fit for the first naval, engineer, and other purposes, that require Timber of the largest dimensions, is situate within from a quarter to three miles of the turnpike-road and canal to Merthyr, and the port of Cardiff, and within twelve miles of the last place. For particulars apply to Mr. Vaughan, Solicitor, Swansea, who will appoint a person to shcw the Timber. Swansea, Jan. 6, 1804. 
To MONEYED ME N. A GENTLEMAN who has Discovered a New, and improved Method of Manufacturing seve- ral articles of trade with more expedition and greater saving than is now done, and whose large profits would in every respect supersede the many opulent Gentlemen engaged in it at present, tho' the said articles are always wanted and prove very lucrative in their actual method of manufactu- ring Wishes to meet with two, or three Gentlemen of fortune to become concerned, and assist, in all pecuniary matters to connect the three Branches of Manufacture into ONE CONCERN, and to construct, erect, and place all the necessary Engines, with their Implements, calculated to carry on the Business on a new Plan. Apply, by letter (post-paid) to P. R. Benson, Esq. at Mr. Galloway's, Engineer, No. 56, Holborn, London or to Wm. David, Esq. at the Printer's, Wind-street, Swansea. 
WAR-OFFICE. NOTICE to OFFICERS in the ARMY. SEVERAL OFFICERS of the ARMY hav ing represented, that they have been required, by the Assessors, under the Property Act, in the Districts in which they are or have been stationed, to make Returns of their Military Income, in order to their being assessed for the same in such Districts Notice is hereby given, that all Of- ficers oi the Army, whether on Full or Half-Pay, will be assessed for their Military Income, under the Directions of the Commissioners, appointed by the Lords Commissioners of His Majesty's Treasury, for Assessing the Army in Ge- neral. Dated at the War-Office this 14th Day of January, 1804. By Order of the Commissioners for Assessing the Pay and Allowances of Officers in the Armv. CHA. HAMILTON, Clerk. Instructions for the Guidance of Officers in milking out their Military. Income, are now preparing. 
RHEUMATIC, PARALYTIC, and GOUTY Affections, with their usual concomitants, Spasm, or flying Pains, Flatulency, Indigestion, and general Debi- lity, (originating in whatever source) are relieved and fre- quently cured by WHITEHEAD'S ESSENCE of MUS- TARD PILLS, after every other means had failed. The FLUID ESSENCE of Mustard, (used with the Pills in those complaints, where necessary,) is perhaps the most active, penetrating, and effectual remedy in the world, ge- nerally curing the severest SPRAINS AND BRUISES in less than half the time usually taken by Opodeldoc, Ar- quebusade, or any other Embrocation and if used im- mediately after any accident, it prevents the part turning black: and the stiffness naturally arising from the first use of the MUSKET, it immediately removes. It is prepared and sold at 25. 9d. each Box or Bct'ae, by R. Johnson, Apothecary, No. 15, Greek-Street, Soho, London and may be had of T. Jenkins, and G. Allen, Swansea. 
THE GREAT RESTORATIVE TO HEALTH. MANN'S APPROVED MEDICINE for Violent Coughs, Colds, Asthmas, Consumptions, Hooping Coughs, &c. &c. W. F. Sullivan, A. B. called on Mr. Mann, of Horsham, Sussex, on the 2d of Nov. 1803, and voluntarily gave him the following Case Sir, I have within these four years past used your Approved Medicine, and have proved it such my Case has been a Rheumatic Complaint, always preceded by a violent cold, cough and hoarseness, which symptoms vanished in taking one 2S. 6d. Bottle, and another totally removed the com- plaint I always use it at this time of the year as a pre- ventive, and recommend it strongly to the afflicted. I am now in my 47th year, and have been botter in health since I have used your invaluable Composition.—You are at li- berty to publish this, or show it to whom you please, I am, Sir, with gratitude, Your obliged humble servant, W. F. SULLIVAN, A. B. Late of the Theatres Royal, Windsor, Weymouth, cfc. &c. Sold in Bottles at 2s. 6d. and 4s. 6d. each, duty included, by T. Jenkins, Swansea, and by the Principal Venders of Medicines in Great Britain. Engraved OIL the Stamp, Thos. MANN, Horsham, Sussex, to counterfeit which is Felony. The foliowing Articles are sold by T. JENKINS, Printer, Swansea, and one Vender in every Town: BEAUTY and CLEANLINESS. AMBO YNA MOUTH POWDER and LOTION. A GENTLEMAN offers the only Drug yet discovered, that instantly destroys the Scurvy, heals the Gums, makes them and the Lips of a healthful red, fastens, whitens, and preserves the Teeth, and makes the Breath sweet. It is the produce of a far foreign country, never imported but by the proprietor and the first gentlemen of the faculty who use it, declare it a fine stomachic and bracer, and for safety proper for an infant. It eradicates the foulness the mouth is subject to, from diet, or a disordered stomach, by its healing, purifying, and balsamic qualities.—Fortune may procure luxuries, but they cannot be enjoyed without good Teeth, Gums, and a sweeth Breath and next to good Health, good Teeth are the greatest ornament, comfort, and blessing. The proprietor is a gentleman of fortune, and will forfeit icool. to any lady or gentlemaji who uses the Drug as he directs, if the Teeth ach, or a Tooth decays. Ask for the Amboyna Mouth Powder, price 2s, 6d. per box. Amboyna Lotion, 4s. 6d. duty included. N. B. Amboyna Lotion (prepared from the Drug) for decayed Gums and Teeth, that cures and prevents Gum- boils, &c. &c. Suitable brushes, warranted. For COUGHS, COLDS, ASTHMAS, &c. CHURCHs COUGH DROPS. Prepared only by Shaw and Edwards, 66, St. Paul's Church-yard, London, who having purchased the Recipes of Mrs. E. Church, are alone authorized to prepare and sell all Mr. Church's Medicines. These Cough Drops have cured more Colds, Coughs, and Asthmas, the last ten years, than any medicine ever pub- lished, they invariably perform a cure with perfect safity, and in a much shorter time than can be credited but by experience; Coughs and Colds, however obstinate and long standing, are speedily removed by gentle but insen- sible perspiration, they allay that convulsive excitement, called tickling in the throat, which is the constant stimulus to coughing, and enable the afflicted to speak and breathe freely. Asthmatic persons have been cured by this medicine, after suffering and struggling seven or fourteen years with an enemy that frequently threatened suffocation. Witness Mr. N. Langworth's case, of Ebenezer Chapel, Lincoln's- Inn Fields, whose testimony is the strongest proof of its efficacy ever offered to the public in favour of any me- dicine. Disorders of the Breast and Lungs, Consumptive Affec- tions, Obstructions in the Glands, and Congealed Phlegm, are with ease and safety removed in fact, for all disorders of the Breast and Lungs, no medicine ever experienced so extensive a sale, or more public approbation.—Price only 25. per bottle, or double the quantity for 3s. 9d. Observe none can possibly be genuine, unless the name of Shaw and Edwards, 66, St. Paul's Church-yard, is en- graved on the stamp accompanying each bottle. 
ODE FOR THE NEW YEAR. By H. y. PYE, Esq. Poet Laurent. WHEN, at the Despot's dread command, Bridg'd Hellespont his myriads bore From servile Asia's peopled strand To Graecia's and to Freedom's share— While hostile fleets terrific sweep With threatening oar th' Ionian deep, Clear Dirce's bending reeds among, The Theban Swan no longer sung No more by Isthmus' wave-worn glade. Or Nemea's rocks, or Delphi's shade, Or Pisa's olive-rooted grove, The temple of Olympian Jove, The Muses twin'd the sacred bough, To crown th' athletic victor's brow, Till on the rough Ægean main, Till on Platea's trophied plain, Was crush'd the Persian Tyrant's boast, O'erwhelm'd his fleet, o'erthrown his host. Then the bold Theban seiz'd again the lyre. And struck the cords with renovated nre On human life's delusive state, Tho' woes unseen uncertain, wait, Heal'd in the gen'rous breast is every pain, With undiminished force-if Freedom's rights maintain" t Not so the British Muse—Tho' rude Her voice to Grcecia's tuneful choir, By dread, by danger unsubdu'd, Dauntless she wakes the lyric wire So when the awful thunder roars, When round the livid lightnings play, The imperial eagle proudly soars, And wings aloft her daring way. And, hark with animating note Aloud her strains exulting float, While pointing to th' inveterate host, Who threat destruction to this envied coast: Go forth, my sons-as nobler rights ye claim, Than ever fann'd the Grecian patriot's flame, So let your breast a fiercer ardour feel, Led by your patriot King, to guard your country's weal." Her voice is heard—from wood, from vale, from down, The thatch-roofed village, and the busy town, Eager th' indignant country swarms, And pours a people clad in arms, Numerous as those as Xerxes led, To crush devoted Freedom's head Firm as the band for Freedom's cause who stood, And stain'd Thermopylae: with Spartan blood Hear o'er their head th' exulting goddess sing These are my favourite sons, and mine their warrior King 1" Thro' Albion's plains while wide and far Swells the tumultuous din of war, While from the loom, the forge, the flail, From Labour's plough, from Commerce' sail, All ranks to martial impulse yield, And grasp the spear, and brave the field, Do weeds our plains uncultur'd hide ? Does drooping Commerce quit the tide ? Do languid Art and Industry Their useful cares no longer ply ? Never did Agriculture's toil With richer harvests clothe the soil Ne'er were our barks more amply fraught, Ne'er were with happier skill our ores, our fleeces wrought. While the proud foe, to swell invasion's host, His bleeding country's countless millions drains, And Gallia mourns thro' her embattled coast, Unpeopled cities, and unlabour'd plains, To guard and to avenge this favour'd land, Tho' gleams the sword in ev'ry Briton's hand, Still o'er our fields waves Concord's silken wing, Still the Arts flourish, and the Muses sing While mortal Truth, and Faith's celestial ray, Adorn, illumine, and bless, a George's prosperous sway. See Pind. Isth. Ode viii. t Ibid. 
THE CURATE.—A FRAGMENT. By the late Rev. THOMAS PENROSE. O'ER the pale embers of a-dying fire, His little lampe fed with but little oile, The Curate sat (for scantie was his hire) And ruminated sad the morrow's toil. 'Twas Sunday's eye, meet season to prepare The stated labours of the coming tyde No day of rest to him-but day of care At raanie a church to preach with tedious ride. Before him sprede his various sern-ions lay, Of explanation deepe, and sage advice The harvest gain'd from many a thoughtful daye, The fruit of learninge, bought with heavy price. On these he cast a fond but tearful eye Awhile he paus'd, for sorrowe stopp'd his throte Arrous'd at lengthe, he heav'd a bitter sighe, And thus complainde, as well indeed he mote :— Hard is the scholar's lot, condemn'd to sail Unpatroniz'd o'er life's tempestuous wave Clouds blind his sight, nor blows a friendly gale, To waft him to one port-except the grave. Big with presumptive hope, I launch'd my keele With youthful ardour and bright science frauglite, Unanxious of the pains long doom'd to feel, Unthinking that the voyage might end in noughte. '1 Pleas'd on the summer sea I daunc'd awhile With gay companions, and with views as fair; Outstripp'd by these, I am left to humble toil, My fondest hope abandon'd in despair. Had my ambitious mind been led to rise To highest flights, to Crosier and to Pall, Scarce could I mourn the missinge of the prize, For soaringe wishes well deserve their fall. No tow'ringe thoughts like these engag'd my breast I hop'd (nor blame, ye proud, the lowly plan) Some little cove, some parsonage of rest, The schcme of duty suited to the man Where, in my narrow sphere secure, at ease, From vile dependence free, I might remain, The guide to good, the counsellor of peace, The friend, the shepherd of the village swain. Yet cruel fate denied the small request, And bound me fast in one ill-omen'd hour Beyond the chance of remedie, to reste The slave of wealthie pride and priestlie pow'r. Oft as in russet weeds I scour along, In distant chappels hastilie to pray By nod scarce notic'd of the passing thronge 'Tis but the Curate, every cJÚldc will say. Not circumscrib'd in dignitie alone, Do I my rich superior's vassal ride Sad penurie, as was in cottage known, With all its frowns, does o'er my roof preside. Ah not for me the harvest yields its store, The bough-crown'd shock in vain attracts mine eye To labour doom'd, and destin'd to be poor, I pass the field, I hope not envious by. When at the altar surplice-clad I stand, The bridegroom's joy draws forth the golden fee The gift I take, but dare not close my hand, The splendid present centres not in me." Catera desunt. 
VOLUNTEERS. Copy of a circular letter from Mr. Secretary Yorke to the Lieutenants in the several counties in Great Britain My Lord, Whitehall, Jan. 14, 1804. His Majesty's confidential servants have thought it to be their duty, on further considering the im- Z, provements of which the volunteer system is capa- ble, to extend to it every useful aid and assistance which it can receive, consistent with a due atten- tion to that principle of economy on which the whole system is founded, and have resolved to allow of Adjutants and Serjeant-Majors on permanent pay to corps of the different descriptions of force, con- sisting of the following numbers, without any z' ether conditions or restrictions than such as may be applicable to the whole volunteer establish- ment. CAVALRY.—To every corps, consisting of not less than 300 effective rank and file of cavalry, and ad- jutant on permanent pay will be allowed.- [Pay when not called out into actual service, 6s. per day, 2s. ditto for a horse.j To every corps of cavalry under 300 rank and file, but consisting of not less than three troops of 40 effective rank and file each, a Serjeant- Major will be allowed on permanent pay.— [Pay when not called out into actual service, 3s. nd. per day, including gd. for a horse.] INFANTRY. — To every corps of infantry (in- cluding artillery) consisting of not less than 500 effective rank and file, one Adjutant, and one Ser- geant-Major, on permanent pay, will be allowed.- [Pay when not called out into actual service, 6s. per day ditto of Serjeant-Major, ditto is. 6d. per day, and 2S. 6d. per week extra.] To every corps of infantry, consisting of not less than 300 effective rank and file, one Adjutant, but no Serjeant-Major, will be allowed on permanent pay.- [Pay, 6s. per day, as above.] To a corps of infantry, under 300 effective rank and file, but consisting of not less than three com- panies of 60 privates each, one Serjeant-Major will be allowed on permanent pay.- [Pay as above, is. 6d. per day, and 2s. 6d. per week extra.] When the corps to which the Adjutants and Serjeant-Majors are appointed shall be called out on actual service by competent authority, these staff-officers will receive the pay of their respec- tive ranks, as in the line. The Adjutants are to be recommended by the Lords Lieutenants, for his Majesty's approbation, in the usual manner; but no recommendation of an Adjutant can be attended to, unless the person recommended has served at least four years as a commissioned officer, or as a Serjeant-Major in the Regulars, embodied Militia, Fencibles, or East India Company's service and the recommenda- I tion must likewise distinctly express the actual period of the service of the person recommended, and specify the particular corps in which that service was performed. Serjeant-Majors may be appointed by the Com- mandant of the corps, from among persons who have served at least three years as non-commis- sioned officers in his Majesty's Regular, embodied Militia, or Fencible forces; and the period of such service, and the particular corps in which it was performed, are to be distinctly specified in the first pay list which shall be transmitted to the War-office, after the appointment takes place. All Adjutants and Serjeant-Majors, who are placed on permanent pay, are to consider them- selves as, at all times, at the disposal, and under the commanding-officer of the corps for the time being, and are expected to give their attendance whenever required, for the drill, good order, and management of the corps. It is not intended by this arrangement, to make any alteration as to the appointment of Adjutants or Serjeant-Majors without pay. They will still be allowed to corps of sufficient strength, as directed by the Militia laws, and as before pointed out by the War-office regulations of the 28th of Septem- ber, 1803. # DOCKS, CANALS, &c. Amidst the warfare in which we are now engaged for our preservation and existence as a nation, it is matter of exultation and self-confidence to reflect, that the most considerable and most important of our public works suffer, comparatively speaking, but little interruption. A scarcity of hands will naturally rather retard the completion of them, and such materials as are wanted must be pur- chased at an increased price, particularly the arti- cles of timber and bricks. THE WEST INDIA DOCKS, occupying a surface of thirty acres for unloading all vessels coming from the West-India Islands and Colonies, have been completed some time since, and there is now suffi- cient accommodation in the substantial and exten- sive stacks of warehouses for such merchants as wish to bond or to house their commodities within the walls, unexposed to fire or plunder, as no lights are suffered at any time, nor any person allowed to remain on board, or within the walls after dark. The excavation of the Dock for loading, which is to occupy twenty-four acres, is proceeding in with great spirit-in the mean while, it is highly gra- tifying to the subscribers, and encouraging to these grand national undertakings, to find that the profits warrant a dividend of ten per cent. on the sums al- ready subscribed, and which the subscribers have begun to receive. THE LONDON DOCK, forming in Wapping, for the accommodation of shipping bringing wines, spirits, rice, and tobacco, and for the whole trade of the port (West and East-India shipping excepted) of such as choose to avail themselves thereof, are in a very advanced state of forwardness, and there is every reason to believe that the Dock of Imports will be ready to receive vessels in the course of the ensu- ing sumner. Immense warehouses are forming, and in particular, a most supendous stack for housing bonded tobacco, which Government are to rent, besides giving every encouragement in their power to the concern, with a view to the security and increase of the public revenue, and to the safety and dispatch of the property of the merchant. THE EAST INDIA DOCK, for the use of the East- India shipping exclusively, is as yet in a state of infancy. The Dock Company have purchased Messrs. Perry's and Well's Wet Dock, for the pur- pose of forming part of the Dock for loading out- wards; and the Dock for unloading is excavating with all possible dispatch, on a site or marsh above, and is to occupy a surface of about eighteen acres, and likely to be completed in the spring of next year. The capital subscribed is 200,0001., there are thirteen directors, of which four must always be directors of the East-India Company. COMMERCIAL ROAD.-In addition to the immense accommodations to trade, a wide road, called the Commercial Road, is nearly paved and finished, commencing at the north-west corner of the West- India Dock, and coming out into Whitechapel, near Aldgate. This road has been used since the opening of the West-India Dock, and the tolls re- cieve weekly from 701. to 801. and are daily in- creasing, and with the profits of houses and lands purchased by the trust, and let, will very shortly yield the subscribers their limited ten per cent. profit on the capital of 50,0001. subscribed.-The road is intended to be carried on to the East- India Dock, and to communicate with the London Dock. THE GRAND JUNCTION CANAL, a concern of im- mense importance to the commerce of the coun- try, is now pretty well known to the public.— They have lately experienced some impediment from the drought during the summer but on the other hand, it has enabled them to repair and cleanse the bottom in some parts where it wanted. The sum subscribed for this concern is about 1,350,0001. and when the tunnel and acqueduct at Blesworth are completed, which, it is expected, will be so at the end of this year, this immense undertaking will be considered as quite complete, and well supplied with water, without interrup- tion then the subscribers will begin to look for- ward for a rapid increase of their dividends, which there can be no manner of doubt will very happily remunerate them for their long patience and spirit of perseverance, in assisting a work of this national consequence. IRELAND.-Works of inland improvement pro- ceeding, in many instances without interruption from the war, are giving every day new facilities to internal trade, 500,0001. were granted in the last session of Parliament to the Directors of Inland Navigation in Ireland. Of this sum 22,6691. 5s. 6d. have been issued to the Royal Canal Company, for the completion of a canal from Dublin to Cool- nahay, in Westmeath, for the execution of certain works at Dublin, and adjoining to the LiNey and for the reduction of the tollson that whole naviga- tion 22,8901. us. od. have been issued, upon con- tract for improvements and the reduction of tolls, to the Barrow Navigation Company. Other small- er sums have been expended upon surveys; and, in general, the progress of canal improvement is, by the effect of the grant, now exceedingly active in Ireland. What a splendid contrasfdo these proved facts furnish to the condition of our enemy. France is driven to acts of unqualified robbery, to collect the momentary means for carrying on the war— her army is unpaid, and held to its obedience by the hope of plunder-her commerce is annihilated -she has now no trade but that of murder and rapine—while in England, the confidence and the wealth of the people are such, that after every sa- crifice which the safety of the empire demands, we find millions embarked,in commercial specu- lations. A SUMMARY Of the most prominent Pditical Occurrences of the Year 1803. Though the year 1803 commenced, to all ap- pearances, in a manner prophetic of a long and uninterrupted tranquillity, even appearances did not continue in this situation long for January had scarcely elapsed before a spirit of suspicion and distrust began to manifest itself in the Cabi- net of London, nor was it groundless, as a sub- sequent discovery has most openly demonstrated; for, during that period in which a peace and friend- ship were supposed to exist between the two na- tions, the Consular Government, ever eager to embrace projects of a clandestine nature, let no opportunity escape of gradually sapping the foun- dation of our political security for this sole pur- pose then, under the cloak' of officiality, were those persons who so undeservedly assumed the title of commercial agents, dispersed in every con- siderable port of the united kingdom, who (as it was afterwards ascertained) had procured sound- ings of the different ports, and accurate charts of almost every part of the coast, professedly for the object of aiding the plan of invasion even at that time most probably in embryo. It is also not un- worthy of remark, that at the very time when those mercenary tools of Bonaparte, the commer- cial agents, were so zealously engaged in the fulfil- ment of their secret missions, other hirelings of his were no less actively employed in resuscitating the dying embers of rebellion among the misguided and infatuated inhabitants of our sister kingdom, thus rendering a peace auxiliary to all the mean and ungenerous artifices of acknowledged hostility. While the means of thus invalidating and final- ly subverting the security of these dominions were prosecuted with all possible vigour and secrecy by the Consular Government, no opportunity was lost of encreasing the military and naval force which was then actually more formidable than the war establishment previoa- to the treaty of A- miens, assigning at the same time no plausible rea- son for a measure so evidently demonstrative of an hostile intention, so contrary to the accustom- ed conduct of nations in a time even of sup- posed peace this proceeding carried a greater de- gree of importance with it, as our forces were at that time reduced to a number far below our usual peace-establishment, and, as it was but natural to expect, arrested the most serious attention of the English Government, by whom it was very pru- dently deemed advisable to take immediate mea- sures for the support of the honour of the British Empire against a conduct so openly treacherous. A message was accordingly sent by his Majesty to both Houses of Parliament, intimating in the most forcible manner his doubts of the sincerity of the French Nation, and recommending every possible exertion for counteracting their inten- tions, at the same time acquainting them of a cor- respondence having taken place between the two countries on the subject. So unexpected a mes- sage from the throne after so short a peace, created in the mind of the public no little degree of sur- prise, and was considered as nothing less than a prelude to more serious events; nor was this opi- nion at all diminished by the accounts which were soon after received of the contumelious and haughty behaviour of the Chief Consul to Lord Whitworth, our Ambassador at the Consular Court: a conduct that betrayed in the strongest light the mean and ungovernable temper of the Ruler of France, and afforded to the English Am- bassador a most illustrious opportunity of dis- playing that noble and elevated greatness so pe- culiarly characteristic of himself and his country. These repeated insults and aggressions on the part of France acquiring daily audacity, very na- turally provoked the indignation of Great Britain and, as no attention has b^en paid to the frequent and urgent remonstrances of the British Court, terms were at length proposed by the latter for the accession of France, founded principally on the restitution of some colonies ceded to her by the treaty of Amiens, and on the emancipation of Holland and Switzerland, with some others of inferior importance with these terms the Consu- lar Government obstinately refused to comply, at the same time presumptuously menacing the inva- sion of this island, if a recommencement of hosti- lities was to be the result. No alternative was now left-the English Ambassador was consequently recalled, and war declared by his Britannic Ma- jesty, the only means remaining of ensuring the independence of our kingdom, to which such an- other peace as that obtained by the treaty of A- miens, would be far more dangerous than the most bloody and inveterate hostility. Scarcely had this new and serious change in the politics of Europe taken place, when an order was issued in France for the immediate detention of all Englishmen who might then be in that country, by which means several hundreds of our nobility and gentry, then on their travels, were put under the severest restrictions, where they still remain prisoners of war. Such an un- exampled breach of hospitality such an outrage against the laws of nations, (it might have been rationally presupposed) would have been produc- tive of similar measures in this country, where equal opportunities were afforded for their exertion; but very different indeed was the conduct of Eng- land in this, as in all her other actions, she was guided by that predominant national principle, generosity, from which no provocation ever so daring, could have compelled her to swerve. As this was a war between England and France, it must consequently happen that France would demand the aid of all her subjugated allies in the contest, there can therefore be no surprise that Holland, in a very short time after our rupture with the French Republic, made an open declara- tion of hostilities against this country, assuring us that it was with the greatest reluctance she was compelled to the measure. The die being now cast, and war having be- come the unavoidable result, the eyes of all Eu- rope were immediately directed to France, and the issue of so important a contest became the object of universal speculation. Although there appeared at this period no continental attack which France could with justice have made, it was no difficult task for her, with such a Ruler at her head, to convert that into justice which to others might seem the most unprincipled agression. Such was the present case; for a month had scarcely elapsed before the French penetrated in- to the Electorate of Hanover, assuming as a pre- tence for so lawless an incursion the relative situa- tion of that state in regard to England. A short contest with troops as unprepared for so sudden an assault as they were unequal in numbers, made the now unfortunate, though once happy Hano- verians, the unresisting victims of French tyranny and ambition. No sooner had these barbarian conquerors obtained this fresh opportunity of putting into practice the fraternal embrace, than the Hanoverian capital became the theatre of the most insolent indignities and the most savage enormities in short, all their actions in this now subjugated territory but served to confirm in the most glaring manner, that character which their former conduct in Italy, Switzerland, and Egypt, had so generally acquired and so justly deserved. This measure, while it was observed by the other powers of Europe with the most unaccount- able ennui, was resented by the English Govern- ment alone in the only manner which existing circumstances admitted. The enemy's troops had occupied the banks of the Elbe and the Weser, by which means all English trading vessels were excluded from a free navigation up those rivers, in consequence of which the British Government put them into a state of blockade, a measure prompted by every sentiment of a just and neces- sary retaliation. While the rapacity of the French arms was thus felt abroad, the presumption and arrogance of their councils were no less visibly demonstrated at home: it has before been observed that Bona- parte had declared his intention of invading this kingdom, and that even antecedent to the recom- mencement of hostilities for this chimerical and romantic purpose were the shores of France and Holland covered with troops, and their harbours crowded with gun-boats destined to bear the fierce invaders to our coast. As these preparations were forwarding with every possible activity, they afford- ed to the British tars many noble opportunities of impressing on the mind of the gasconading ene- my, the sore and galling recollection of the supe- rior courage and dexterity of an English sailor about this time it was, that the port and town of Granville were almost demolished, and several other ports very materially injured by our bold cruisers. Affairs were in this posture, when a most serious and alarming disturbance in Ireland awakened universal surprise; that country, though not pro- bably in a state of absolute security, was generally supposed to enjoy a comparative tranquillity, as was evident from the astonishment with which Ministers themselves beheld this irruption. How- ever contemptible the event might have appeared in the eyes of some, no reasonable proof can be adduced in support of so erroneous an opinion it was undoubtedly of a very important nature, and if not so timely and effectually suppressed as it was, might very possibly have led to a rebellion equally horrible and bloody with that which stained the annals of Ireland during the last war. That this was a project planned by the duplicity of the Consular Government, in the interval between this and the preceding war, admits of very little doubt, and particularly acquires greater probability from the circumstance of a vast quantity of arms and ammunition having been imported into Ireland from France and also of an envoy from the Irish Provisional Government being actually at the time in the French capital. This sudden insurrection, together with the ne- cessary means of defending the country, occu- pied no small attention of the British Parliament at this period the suspension of the Habeas Cor- pus act in Ireland, was consequently an immedi- ate act of the Legislature and from this and the very great zeal and gallantry displayed by the Irish yeomanry, most of the rebel chiefs were apprehended, who, by a merited death, have since atoned for the barbarity of their crimes, and once more was the country tranquillized into ap- parent security. The protection of our political independence becoming now paramount to all other considera-1 tions, several acts were passed for increasing our military force, among which was one for raising an army of reserve of 50,000 men, which, in con- junction with the voluntary exertions of the kingdom at large, rendered "our military force immensely superior to any recorded on the proud- est pages of our history. A number so prodi- giously great as 700,000 soldiers (of which the volunteers alone are 400,000) will probably at some future period, require more than ordinary proof. While so glorious and patriotic an una- nimity pervades every class of the community, it must be peculiarly gratifying to observe all party distinction in Parliament buried in one common inclination to preserve the safety and independ- ence of the British empire, against the violent and unruly ambition of the tyrant of France. Thus terminated a most eventful year, in which we have seen France and England in peace and at war, invasion threatened, Hanover taken, Ire- land in rebellion, and, to crown the whole, the most brilliant instance of unanimity and patriot- J ism that every brightened the annals of history may it still continue to display itself with that splendour with which it has hitherto shone, until it has proved itself an impregnable barrier to the ambitious views of that man, who, from desires of an universal and despotic rule, has dared again to intrude upon the peace of Europe, and the world January, 1804. vl MARKED.—At Bath, Mr. Thomas Edwards, jun. of Newport, Monmouthshire, to Mrs. Kernan, daughter of the late J. Adams, Esq. Chelwood House, Somerset.—At Tadcaster, Mr. John Bailey, shoemaker, aged 78, after a tedious courtship of seven days, to Mrs. Hague, his fifth wife. DEATHS.-Last week, the Dowager Countess Talbot.— Sir Frances Sykes, M. P. for Wallingford, Berks, in his 70th year.-Robert Drummond, Esq. banker, Charing- cross.-Right Hon. Leonard Lord Holme, Baron Holmes, of Kilmallock, in the county of Limerick.-At the Hot- wells, Bristol, Viscountess Bolingbroke.-At Hereford, in his 79th year, Francis Campbell, M. D. one of the mem- bers of the Corporation, and father of the city. BANKRUPTSfrom Saturday's Gazette. John Crabb, James Crabb, Wm. Crabb, and Nicholas Larkham, Wilts, clothiers, Feb. 2, 3, March 3, at the Red- Lion, New Sarum. Attornies, Tinney, Salisbury, or Low- ten, Temple. Henry Hewett, Henry Roche, and Thomas Postlethwaite, Sheffield, Yorkshire, silver-platers, Feb. 3, 4, March 3, at the Angel, Sheffield. Attornies, Bigg, Hatton Garden, or Rodgers, Sheffield. John Petrie, Kempton, and John Ward, Hanworth, Mid- dlesex, dealers, Jan. 24, Feb. 14, March 3, at Guildhall, Attorney, Jackson, Fenchurch-street, London.. John Ridge Upcott, Bedminster, Somerset, grocer. Feb. 3, 4, March 3, at the White-Lion, Bristol. Attornies, Hall and Jerman, Bristol, or Tarrant and Moule, Chancery-lane, London. John Polley, St. Giles, Oxford, sacking-manufacturer, Jan. 27, Feb. 4, March 3, at the Angel, Oxford. Attornies, Walsh, Oxford, or Townsend, Staple-Inn, London. Thos. Jarrett, Evesham, Worcestershire, innholder, Feb. 3, 4, March 3, at the Crown, Eversham. Attornies, Cheek, Evesham, or Bousfield, Bouverie-street, Fleet-street. Wm. Chivers, Stepney, mariner, Feb. 4, 7, Mardh 3, at Guildhall. Attorney, Nind, Goodman's-fields. Thos. Gregory, Tabernacle-walk, Middesex, plumber. painter, and glazier, Jan. 28, Feb. 2, March 3, at Guildhall. Attorney, Crawford, City-road. James Henry Champion, Gravesend, Kent, grocer, Jan. 28, Feb. 2, March 3, at Guildhall. Attorney, Tipping, New- City Chambers. s. Wm. Tomlins, Bridge-road, Lambeth, coach-maker, Jan. 28, Feb. 4, March 3, at Guildhall. Attorneys, Burgoyne and Fielder, Duke-street, Grovesnor-square. James Finden the Younger, Clipstone-street, Middlesex, carpenter and joiner, Jan. 28, Feb. 4, March 3, at Guildhall. Attornies jeyes and Turner, Charlotte-street, Fitzroy-square. Fortescue Bate, Vigo-lane, Golden-square, printseller, Jan. 24, Feb. 7, March 3, at Guildhall. Attorney, Dixon, Nassau-street. Abram Comport Emdia, Portsmouth, shopkeeper, Jan. 24, Feb. 7, March 3, at Guildhall. Attorney, Berry, Walbrook, London. Benjamin Betts and Ann Smith, Basinghall-street, factors, Jan. 24, Feb. 7, March 3, at Guildhall. Attorney, Dann, Threadneedle-street. Thos. Bushnell, Westminster-road, Surrey, wheel-wright, Jan. 28, Feb. 4, March 3, at Guildhall. Attorney, Anthony) Earl-street, Blackfriars. Charlotte Thomas, New Bond-street, milliner, Jan. 24, ST. March 3, at Guildhall. Attorney, Eves, Bedford-row. Edward Merton, Ilminster, Somerset, mercer and draper, Tan. 31, Feb. 4, March 3, at Guildhall. Attorney, Adams, Old Jewry, London. DIVIDENDS. Jan. 30. H. M. Bird and B. Savage, Jeffries'-square, London, at Guildhall.—Feb. 13. J. Passman, Doncaster, machine maker, at the White-Hart tavern, Kingston-upon- Hull.—14. M. Hughes, Mourning-lane, Hackney, milk- man, at Guildhall.—15. R. Wood, Slathwaite, Yorkshire, corn-factor, at the George inn, Huddersfield. —R. Lloyd, Thavies inn, money scrivener, at Guildhall.—16. J. Bar- ker Fieldhead, Cumberland, woolmonger, at the Grapes, Carlisle.—C. Lowe, jun. Boston, Lincolnshire, miller, at the Woolpack inn, Boston.—20. J. Snape, Shelton, Staf- fordshire, baker, at the Bell inn, Derby.—21. J. P. Smart, Hanover-street, Hanover square, tailor, at Guildhall.—25. J. Robins and J. Anderson, Water-lane, London, glass- sellers, at Guildhall.-28. P. Favene, Bedford-row, Mid- dlesex, insurance broker, at Guildhall.—29. M. Nash, Wotton-under-Edge, Glocestershire, currier, at the Swan inn, Wotton-nnder-Edge.-March 16. G. and H. Brown, Liverpool, merchants, at the Globe tavern, Liverpool. CERTIFICA TES. Feb. 11. R. Stephenson, Fetter-lane, Holborn, cutler.- N. Cockayne, Derby, baker.-W. P. Joggett, Bridgewater- square, London, insurance-broker.—T. B. Taylor, Leices- ter-square, Westminster, ladies shoe-maker.—B. Cock, North Audley-street, Grosvenor-square, baker.-C. Bell, Samp- son's-gardens, Wapping, mariner.-G. Martin, Suffolk-street, Charing-cross, watch-maker.—H. Lea, Little Moorfields, London, tobacconist. BANKR UPTS from Tuesday's Gazette. John Price, Finsbury-square, London, merchant, Feb. 4, 7, March 6, at Guildhall. Attornies, Messrs. Williams and Sherwood, Cornhill. Thomas Emerton, Stoney-Stratford, Bucks, grocer, Feb. 15, 16, March 6, at the Cock-inn, Stoney-Stratford. Attor- nies, Mr. Worley, Stoney-Stratford, or Messrs. Kinderley, Long, and Ince, Chancery-lane, London. Thomas Winterburn, Whixley, Yorkshire, shopkeeper, Feb. 16, 18, March 6, George-inn, York. Attornies, Messrs. Russell and Bourne, York, or Messrs. Cardale, Hallward, and Spear, London. William Bosma, Finsbury-square, London, merchant, Jan. 28, Feb. 11, March 6, Guildhall. Attornies, Messrs. Crow- der, Lavie, and Garth, Old jewry, London. Thos. Smith, Gould-hill, Middlesex, linen-draper, Jan. 31, Feb. 7, .March 6, at Guildhall. Attorney, Mr. Burroughs, Castle-street, Falcon-square, London. John Chapman, Nottingham, hosier, Feb. 9, 10, March 6, at Guildhall. Attornies, Messrs. Windus's and Holtaway, Southampton-buildings, Chancery-lane, London, or Mr. R. Waller, Chesterfield, Derbyshire. John Ringrose, York, vintner, Feb. 16, 17, March 6, at Henry Howletts, Lendall, in York. Attornies, Mr. Tate, York, or Messrs. Allen and Exley, Furnival's-inn, London. Thos. Mast, Tempsfrod-Mills, Bedfordshire, miller, Feb. 15, 16, March 6, at the Rose and Crown Inn, Wisbech St. Peters, Cambridgeshire. Attornies, Mr. C. Metcalfe, Wis- bech St. Peters, or Messrs. Baxters and Martin, Furnival's- inn, London. Elsdon Anthony Vince, Grinstead, Essex, merchant, Feb. 6, 7, March 6, at the Red-Lion, Colchester. Attornies, Wm. Sudell, Colchester, or Mr. T. Evans, Thavies-inn, London. Thomas Reddish, otherwise Thomas Solomon Reddish, Bucklersbury, London, warehouseman, Jan. 28, Feb. 4, March 6, at Guildhall. Attornies, Mr. John Foulkes, Bury- place, Bloomsbury, or Mr. Edw. Foulkes, Manchester. John Townsend, Stones-end, Southwark, wine-merchant, Jan. 28, Feb. 11, March 6, at Guildhall. Attorney, Mr. Teasdale, Bishopsgate-street, London. Wm. Beales, Bermondsey, Surrey, flour-factor, Jan. 28,. Feb. 7, March 6, at Guildhall. Attorney, Mr. Rippon, Bermondsey-street, Southwark. Robt. Colls, Woodford, Essex, corn-dealer, Jan. 28, Feb. 9, March 6, at Guildhall. Attomies, Messrs. Wright and Bovill, Chancery-lane, London. Mary Robbins and Catherine Robbins, Birmingham, shop- keepers, Jan. 28, Feb. 4, March 6, at Guildhall. Attorney, Mr. Richardson, Monument-yard, London. DIVIDENDS. Feb. 4. J. Nesbit, E. Stewart, and J. Nesbitt, jun. of Aldermanbury, London, merchants, at GuildhalL-II. J. Tatlock, Finch-lane, London, broker, at Guildhall.—13. R. Smith, Bradford, Wilts, victualler, at the New Bear inn, Bradford.—14. S. Gifford, Exeter, dyer, at Guildhall. —15. J. West, Long-acre, watch-maker, at Guildhall.— N. Noble, Berrier, Cumberland, dealer in butter and hams, at the George inn, Penrith.—17. A. Worboys and T. Sydes, Birmingham, sword-cutlers, at Freeth's coffee- house, Birmingham.—18. J. Wigfield, jun. Northallerton, Yorkshire, mercer and grocer, at the Unicorn inn, Ripon. -A. Thompson and B. White, Bow-lane, London, hosiers and factors, at Guildhall.-20. Eliz. Fearhead, Tunstal, Suffolk, grocer, at the Crown Inn, Woodbridge.-24. W. Entwistle, of Entwistle, Lancashire, cotton-manufacturer,, at the Wheatsheaf, Edgworth.—25. J. Wild, J. Watts, and J. Body, Upper Thames-street, London, grocers and sugar-refiners, at Guildhall.—28. J. Gibbs, Wrotham, Kent, corn-chandler, at Guildhall.—March 1. W. Webster, Fore-street, London, linen-draper, at Guildhall.—R. Sykes, Cheapside, linen-draper, at Guildh,1.11.-8. P. Mills, Here- ford, butcher, at the Boothall-inn, Hereford. CERTIFICA TES. Feb. 14. R. Killick, Blackfriars-road, Surry, chaise- maker.-R. Hattersley, Doncaster, Yorkshire, grocer.- P. D. Van Dyck, A. J. G. Leuven, and W. A. de Gruiter Vink, Circus, Minories, London, merchants.—J. Janson, Blackburn, Lancashire, cotton-manufacturer. 
ADVERTISEMENTS and Orders for this Paper, authentic Articles of Intelligence and literary Communications (post-paid), are respectfully requested to be addressed to the PRINTER, at SWANSEA, or to either of the under-mentioned AGENTS GLAMORGANSHIRE. Cardiff, Mr. J. Bird. Merthyr Tidvil, Mr. W. M. Davis. Cambridge, Mr. Bradley. Bridgend, Mr. Francis. Neath, Mr. Bartleman. Pyle, Mr. Marment. Caerphilly, Mr. Howell, Postman. CARMARTHENSHIRE. Carmarthen, Mr. Daniel. Llanelly, Mr. Le Caan. Kidwelly, Mr. Davis, Postmaster. Llandilo, Mr. G. Jenkins. Llandovery, Mr. Price, Postmaster. Langharne, Mr. Woods. PEMBROKESHIRE. Haverfordwest, Mr. Potter. Milford, Mr. Randall. Pembroke, Mr. Williams, Postmaster Tenby, Mr. Hales. Narberth, Mr. George, Postmaster. Fishguard, Mr. Thomas, Ditto. CARDIGANSHIRE. Cardigan, Mr. T. Dickens. Aberystwith, Mr. Jones, Postmaster. Lampeter, Mr. Jones, Ditto. BRECONSHIRE. Brecon, Messrs. }. & A. Williams. Builth, Mr. D. Pritchard. Hay, Mr. Davies, Postmaster. Crickhowell, Mr. Herbert, Ditto. RADNORSHIRE. Knighton, Mr. R. Williams. Presteign, Mr. Sirrell. Rhayader, Mr. Evans, Postmaster. New Radnor, Mr. D. Williams. Penybont, Mr. S. Davies. MONGOMERYSHIRE. Welchpool, Mr. Owen. Montgomery, Miss Lloyd. Machynlleth, Mrs. Lewis. Newtown, Mr. Owen, Postmaster. Llanidlos, Mrs. Parry. MERIONETHSHIRE. Bala, Mr. Lancaster. Dolgelly, Mr. T. Williams. Barmouth, Mr. J. Griffiths. DENBIGHSHIRE. Denbigh, Mr. Roden. Ruthin, Mr. Griffiths, Postmaster. Wrexham, Mrs. Tye. Llanrust, Mr. Goodwin. CARNARVONSHIRE. Carnarvon, Mr. Evan Lloyd. ANGLESEY. Beatimaris, MrWilliams, Postmaster MONMOUTHSHIRE. Monmouth, Mr. Heath. Chepstow, Mr. Abergavenny, Mr. Watkins. Pontypool, Mrs. Allgood. Newport, Mr. HEREFORDSHIRE. Hereford, Mr. Allen. Leominster, Mr. Wyke. Kingston, Mr. D. Pugh. Ross, Mr. Medhurst. ¡ Ledbury, Mr. Taylor, Feathers'-Inn. Ludlow, Mr. Griffiths. Oswestry, Mr. Salter. Bishty's Castle, Mr. Griffiths. Bath, Mr. Meyler. Bristol, Mr. W. Pine. • Birmingham, Mess. Knott & Lloyd. Frome, Mr. Cary. Glocester, Mr. C. Jones. Shepton-Mallett, Mess. Cary & Son. Truro, Mr. T. Flindell. Worcester, Mr. Tymbs. ADVERTISEMENTS will likewise be received by the PRINTERS of all Provincial Newspapers and in LONDON by Messrs. TAYLER and NEWTON, Warwick-square, Newgate-street; at the CHAPTER, PKELE'S, and GEORGE'S COFFEE HOUSES (at all which places THE CAMBRIAN will regularly filed) and by Mr. G R. WARD, Paternoster-row.—This Paper will be sent free of Postage to any part of the kingdom. 
